Hi everybody!
You ever watch the tee-wee news, and hear some public servant standing up there, telling us all how it is necessary to have bipartisan cooperation? How we need to be reasonable, how it is necessary to compromise? These goofs, who just went out and mortgaged the future to the tune of 3.4 trillion federal reserve notes, telling their masters why it is necessary to *reach across the aisle* to get something done?
Electorates across Europe increasingly call for more consensus rule in their governments. They know that divided governments force such dialogues; in effect, a checks and balances system pervades.
I write this all now because I have been conflicted over using the word "pain". You're not supposed to say pain when you're in Hypnobirthing, you're supposed to use words like powerful and intense. Using the word pain invites the negative perception, thus the sensation, into your experience.
Anyway, in only slightly more relevant news, my mom and I scout for each other all the time. We are both avid collectors of this, that, and the other thing, as well as discerning dressers and decorators, and while our individual tastes are often very different, we have an almost psychic radar for what the other might like. So if, say, I'm knocking around in Anthropologie and come across a dainty handpainted bird doorknob, or she's in our favorite little hometown proud antique mall by the library and sees a killer vintage leopard collar, we give each other the heads up. Its like having a personal shopper, only ten times better, because I get to shop for her, too! And any excuse for extra shopping is a good one.
But before I move onto the awards, I want to talk about Sudha's blog. It is a space in which Sudha jots down her recipes and also her thoughts. If you, like me, is fond of a good story then you will have to check out her blog. This lady knows how to spin magic with her words. I do not know if it is permissible in the world of food blogs, but often I am chuckling so hard or nodding my head in agreement about what Sudha had written that I almost forget to check out her recipes. Almost but not quite, if you know what I mean!
I know a lot of people seek treatment and there's nothing wrong with that. If it's affecting a person's self esteem, treatment should be considered. I think this is probably especially true with people who have darker complexions where the loss of pigment is more obvious. But it doesn't really bother Jackson at this point. In fact, he thinks it pretty cool that he "glows in the dark"! (The white patches fluoresce under black light.) Right now, the only thing I'm doing is talking to him about the fact that it doesn't matter what a person looks like on the outside. I tell him he's a funny, quick-witted, compassionate, smart kid and that's what counts.
Throw those preconceived notions out the window. This wine is fabulous.
Will it work? The new site is easier to figure out and more business friendly, but there have also been some murmurings that the new Twitter looks a lot like the old Facebook.
Instead, the government prints money (in the digital realm, not on paper) with virtually no limitations (since it makes its own rules and laws), and continuously invests those digital dollars into real assets, stocks, real estate, investment funds, etc.
2 awards later came Best Sport. I remember Lawrence and Rosie coming over to me, holding my hands and saying “No matter what happens-” before I cut them off. I knew what they were thinking, because I was thinking it too. As Head of Sport, this definitely meant something to me. A highly commended would have been enough. If there were fewer entries in the category, I might have had more faith. But when you’re up against 20 other entries, the second-most contested category, faith can only hold out so long. The HC went to Spark TV, and a bit of hope faded. Then Paul Ryan said the following:
I would have Bernardo Carpio, the giant, and we will laugh about how storytellers (including me) twist his story to suit our ends.
Marge: You did?
Reporters and their bosses are still out there chasing each others' tails looking for the next O.J. or Nicole Smith. What's the latest hot story eating up thousands of reporter-hours as we speak? The possibility that John Edwards and his mistress made a sex tape. If it doesn't turn up, they'll just go back to their endless follow-ups on Sanford and Jackson.
“It’s a great opportunity for him to talk to young people, to students, about how this is really a debate about the economy and jobs and the need to stabilize the foundation of the economy and creating jobs and lessening the economic anxiety out there, felt by students.” — White House Press Secretary Jay Carney said Thursday aboutr President Obama’s Town Hall at the University of Maryland
Don’t underestimate the book cover. It is the first thing that the reader sees. The first thing that catches their eye. The eBook cover is a little different in that, less is more. You don’t want to clutter up the cover. First, no one will see it. eBook covers are small on the sites where they are featured (it is a thumbnail world), so if it looks good at a 100×100 pixel, then you should be OK.
The experience in general was great. Katie, Kate, and I gelled quite well in my opinion and got on the same page pretty fast. Kate and really got into the groove of things on day two. We were able to both collaboratively work off of a single Github repo and merge with one another pretty painlessly. In typical hack-a-thon fashion, a lot of ideas were tried, didn’t necessarily work, and were thrown away, which was one of our groups strengths in my opinion. Since we weren’t afraid to try things we were able to create a tonne of small prototypes and were able to see what worked and what didn’t very fast. Some of the prototypes that we created and threw away were things like pulling in an RSS feed on relevant information and displaying it across the background of a page, a map of the world that lit up various regions as you scrolled through the page, and many more. It was awesome that Katie was on board with all of this as well, as I’m sure it had to seem quite hectic and scary at times!
So, till then, I shall be back soon…
Director: Thorgeir Gudmundsson Screenplay: Óttarr Ólafur Proppé
1-1.5lb Ham Bone or Smoked Ham hock
The power of prayer is immense. I had a friend early on named Leonard. When he would tell his story, he’d say that it wasn’t his prayers that got him to AA but the prayers of other people. He had no God of his own, but the faith of his mom and grandma was unwavering.
I wish you all Love and Happiness Always!
Some of the articles are real and some are just rumors but not sure which is true and which are fake but the recent “Malay girl being ‘kidnapped’ in Tampines Street 22″ happened to be a hoax. The Singapore Police has told the public not to spread ‘unsubstantiated information’ about unverified ‘kidnapping’ of children recently which may cause ‘unnecessary alarm’.
But now I only hear
ICD to probe 'death squad' cops - 15 Dec
No big deal.
(Wash, rinse, repeat…right?)
After the excitement of being asked to do the book the fear and self doubt grabbed me by the throat...
"...he has worked on the plight of Muslims around the world ranging from the collapse of former Yugoslavia, to the Chechens and Palestinians. He has been on many delegations to the Arab world, the US, Eastern Europe, Africa, the former states of the USSR and the Far East, meeting with heads of state to discuss their respective problems and how he may be able to assist them."
Brandee & Krystal
If you don't want to be caught out, refuse to hear their question
I received either a compliment or an insult today, and I'm not sure which it was.
I was expecting something more outrageous and bold seeing some of the things she does on her show. I do like her simpleness and clean lines throughout. Everything is mostly neutral with pops of color. One of her favorite places for accessories? Homegoods.
This shows my way of handling them – how do you spin yours?
I'd do a hybrid. I've been wanting to do a post on some of my
I am a former a reporter, editor and columnist for the (redacted), have freelanced articles for regional and national magazines, have been anthologized and have a book about “classic” cameras still in print. I know the value of good editing, respond to it, and am trained
It's been nearly four months, and look I'm still not smoking, but I sure am sniffing. I am inhaling passively every chance I get.
I WILL NOT bring my fat jeans along on this trip… but there is always the temptation of comfy leggings that accommodate any lumps, bumps and expansions. But I resolve! And how important is it in the big scheme of things??
Geej: How old is he?
On Whitechapel High Street, we put the library – called the Idea Store – right in the middle of the mom-and-pop stores, right by the market. I decided there would be no doors, no grand staging: this was going to be as easy as walking into Marks and Spencer. You don’t go into a hermetic interior where everyone is talking in hushed voices – it was almost as if you passed from the betting shop into the library and went to get a cup of tea.
March has been a month for mourning, for Girlie and myself.
April 29th was on a Wednesday.
DB (dear boyfriend) and I have started down the path to figuring out whether he has PTSD or TBI or both....the frustrating part is that the Army likes to stall, and 3 weeks later still no appointment. Thankfully he still agrees that seeing the civilian therapist I recommended is a good idea, so we will both be going to him this weekend. I'm worried about him though because after bringing up the issue of whether or not we were ever going to move in together (because honestly I was confused, he was the one who wanted to and then suddenly didn't), he was describing how he was feeling lately. Said he was feeling claustrophobic, and that with everything going on it's like his head keeps spinning. He mentioned that he found out one of his former soldiers died/possibly killed himself and I don't know how that's affecting him. I was worried because he said he's having trouble with sleep and his sleep patterns are all off. He talks about how his brain just won't process information sometimes.
I have hashed this out with myself a million times. I grew up chasing my uncle and aunt around a lake behind a ski boat. No fear. The only thing I worried about was a toilette flushed sewer fed alligator that had some how found itself in Lake Weiss just waiting on me, specifically, to fall from my skis. Then with one death role - it would rip my leg right off. Again, this never happened ... except in my over active imagination. Other than that, most summers I grew gills from the amount of time we spent jumping off the dock and swimming around in the murky water. Not to mention the years spent with prune shriveled fingers from hours in a pool with crystal clear water there's no issues either. So why the problem now?
How do you feel about dating multiple people? Be it one, two or five?
(i posted a mapcluster thing at the bottom of the page and right there, in the heart of africa, is the MITM...go look, you'll see him)
Although Ebsco seemed to demonstrate good faith by appearing before the Labour Court to defend its position, the company has so far ignored the court’s recommendation. And if you read the Bible you’ll see that Goliath and the Philistines also initially appeared to be interested in some form of arbitration. Instead of fighting an all-out battle, they proposed single combat to settle the issue – but when the result didn’t go the way they hoped, they turned and ran.
Sometimes, i wish i could go through those careless and innocent days again. Yes, again.
We don’t post ours, because with four posts a month, we take very few guests and we don’t want to be swamped with offers we have to turn down. Make sure you find out how soon they need the material (I like a long lead time, so I can pimp the post.) Also find out what the word count needs to be. (This varies widely, so always ask.)
Contestant: Six.
The more she has to devote to meditation, the more frustrated she becomes, which is an effective means of revealing more and more of the depth of who this person truly is. Take note: Although the project only covers one year in her life and the author has several memories of the past, there are only a couple of instances where she actually goes into a flashback.
The Moon has been considered the source of psychic energy for generations of time. When we say psychic energy we are talking about energy that is relevant to “feeling.” It is solar plexus-based energy, you see. A psychic, for example, will say that they “feel” something is going to happen. The psychic may not always know what it is and can only take an intelligent guess, but the feeling is that something is just not right, that something wrong or bad is happening somewhere. This is psychic energy. Intuitive energy, on the other hand, says that you know something is going on, that something is not right, and oftentimes the person knows precisely what it is. Psychic ability is about feeling, intuitive energy is about knowing. Intuition is 100% accurate, whereas psychic impressions are nowhere near as accurate — perhaps 35-45% is a very good accuracy. Again, psychic ability is based on feelings, and feelings are totally subjective. They are based on you and your experiences. Intuition, on the other hand, is quite a different matter. And so, when we say that the Moon has been the focal point for the lives on Earth for being a generator of, and thus a source of psychic, subjective, subconscious, even unconscious power. This means that Moon energy operates upon on those levels of a human being, i.e. the subconscious, the dream consciousness, and the unconscious.
The highlights of the car are then listed. “LUV is flexible. 5 +2 flexi-seating. LUV is powerful. 95 PS in petrol & 90 PS in diesel. LUV goes further. 16.02* km/l in petrol and 20.77* km/l in diesel. LUV is accommodating. Roominess in a compact design. LUV is comforting. 2nd row AC.”
There is also a section for teachers to share ideas and resources...like Facebook for Teachers. There are lots of junior and high school teachers so elementary teachers are really needed. I have set up 2 groups, one for The Schroeder Page Friends and also one for 2nd grade. I would love it if you all would check them out and join:) Just click the image below to see how it all works.
In essence it’s not an “either/or” conversation but an “and” conversation that should be dominating bar culture. From my humble perspective it has been about good cocktails or good service when the top, and most successful bars are about providing good cocktails and good service. We need both y’all!
human rights advocates condemn killing
3) South Africa
Everyone was shaken up by this. Shankar himself saw that the tent was empty. The coolies lit up torches. Everyone started calling Tirumal. All the tents were checked thoroughly. Tirumal was no where to be found.
“Why? Are you stuck?” he stepped towards the cove.
Most of the time I’ll wander away from an author because I don’t have enough time to read everything I’d want to. Sometimes it’s because I’ve found new authors whose (current) books I’m just in a hurry to read quicker.
Clench was not married and had no children. His funeral is scheduled to take place next week in St. John's.
However, she has the same problem I have – the lack of self confidence.
What further enunciates the interior/exterior relationship in the design is how the light source is hosted. The holes in the Heatherwick building actually fold to embrace or project light. In the daytime, light peers onto the building, creating a sensational illuminated interior. These individual optic rods are attached to the building through ports, which also serve as openings for light to come into the interior. These multiple ports become an assemblage of light sources. At nighttime, the interior is artificially lighted, omitting outward through those ports. The building’s singular light source projects out in multiple directions, and the Seed Cathedral glows. This interplay of light sources, light directions, and light experience coincides with the idea of the Fold, where the interior and the exterior are the same. Light transforms the building, depending on the availability of sources. This design may be a member of a new regime of light Deleuze uses baroque architecture to exemplify the Fold: the interior is autonomous, and the exterior is independent, but both in a way that each impact the other. This fits Deleuze’s theory of the Fold: the inside and outside are inseparable.
Add S&P , lemon zest, garlic and olive oil
The rule of law is the rule of law…
So real life interests and hobbies can inspire miniature projects, and often do. In fact, the very first dollhouse I ever built for myself, a small 4-room Victorian cottage, called simply: Rosewood Cottage, is full of rose-colored and blooming rose-themed items. I’m crazy about English Roses and this project is evidence of that.
It’s 0′dark thirty and they’ve been up for hours,
Your woes are great.
"Fuck you"
dream down the sun
Title: Girl in Translation
My children believe that the more sprinkles, the better. And for Isaac, the more GREEN sprinkles, the better (green is his favorite color!)
Wednesday: 30 min. run
Ladies, please email me your stamp choices at stampandcreate.com!
Anyway, I pointed out that if you get caught buying from such a source, CCP will take it away from you. That and a warning seems to be the standard for a first offense.
1 red
At the start of the luncheon, Mrs. Obama stood at the head of the single, long table, and spoke of her fondness for Hawaii, which she said essentially sealed the deal with her husband.
All the keyframes on the movie clip’s timeline are selected.
We even worked at the same company for close to 5 years and lived together in my first apartment away from home. And actually years later when Jen was little and I was divorced, we lived together once more ~ even after she had her little girl. We were our own unique little family.
I cannot remember what I said during the opening, but Kitty talked about how her two coworkers, who sit on either side of her, spend entire paychecks on gear to prepare for the massive solar flare expected to occur this year. David mentioned all the fallout shelters built in the Sixties, and I corrected him, saying that that was actually in the Fifties.
Desperate for changing
Other actors that auditioned for roles in the film included Mathew Broderick, Michelle Pfeiffer, Geena Davis, Rosanna Arquette, and Ally Sheedy.
Thankfully, Christin and I visited the Officer's Club on Post for it's weekly Sunday Brunch Buffet immediately after the service.
He added: “You need to have absolutely every box ticked if you’re going to win at Barcelona. It’s a place that punishes poor balance like almost nowhere else – if your car is understeering around here, then you’re going to really struggle.”
The flooding in Queensland and NSW may have destroyed up to 20 million tons of wheat and barley crops.
The sensible take on it would be: I have nothing to hide, and it would not be beneficial to let this 'get' to me, so bring it on... which is kinda what I'm aiming for, and some days I even succeed. But lets not forget that this was a difficult relationship to say the least (have a look at the link in the first paragraph of this second post if you're in need of people who can help you, like they did me).
Yes you can fully bleed me, and when hell comes, in your place, I’ll stand.
* Sharpen / Blur
Then my dear friend, Carey in CA. had her birthday recently so I made her a chipboard postcard in her favorite colors. I mailed it in a colorful envelope that I drew and painted on.
Oh sure. I'm capable of that. 7,832 glasses of wine might give me the courage to try it.
But why not pull the wool over your own eyes? It's hard work at first, but more fun. Once you've constructed your alternative reality it's as good a guide as their hype, their agendas & ideologies. Ask your friends to help. Bullshit each other. Cheerfully, and for free. You probably know people expert enough on various subjects such that you can even make good choices by pooling your expertise. Or not. But so what?
They spat upon my Savior, so pure and free from sin,
BILDER-BUST
Happy Spring!! We've been having some lovely warm weather in Montreal, Qc. Canada this week! I am thrilled of course! I hope you are experiencing good weather of your own too, and if not, well I have a challenge to brighten your day anyway!
entwined in sleepy heat
Karla, because I found her kind of recently and I have a little girl-crush on her. I know she's galavanting around Paris right now, but I hope she will do this when she gets back. Oh, and the blue-face thing? That too.
As im aware you probably all have, but beacause u dont know what it means, your now sitting there thinking......what is it?...is it an animal?.....an object?......for the love of mankind TELLL MEEEEEEEEEEEEEE.......
Meanwhile, we learn that Shin's cousin Yul has been living in England for 14 years, but he's returning home to Korea. All the servants love him and remember him fondly, and Yul is generally lighter-hearted than Shin, perhaps because his life hasn't been so full of official obligations. The Queen Mother is thrilled to see her grandson Yul, but the Queen is displeased because she thinks he might supplant her own son, Shin.
To continue with the contents taught the previous class go to the computer lab and make students play the following games in order to identify and build different food chains in different environments, incorporating the idea that in every specific place, there is a specific food chain. Talk about this after playing the games.
I know what I know.
This blog will (hopefully) contain regular updates of our progress across Europe and Asia as we head from England to Czechoslovakia, through eastern Europe to Russia (with a detour to Moscow) and then right across Kazakhstan, cutting back into Russia to cross the border into Mongolia and up to Ulan Bator where the finish line is.
"Great. Can I suggest a big raise." I smile as sweetly as I can manage
Again, Thank You so much. They are all amazing.
There's a couple of excellent beery options available to me this weekend that both have merit.
While it is not required to use Our Daily Bread Designs images and sentiments on your creations, we would love to see them if you have them. As a way of recognizing those who do use Our Daily Bread Designs stamps, we will again be choosing three
When we arrived at the assigned gate, we had to hand over the kids to the teachers. Parents were not allowed on the field.
The pleasing pasta is a great accompaniment to most any lunch or dinner.
Now, it's my pleasure to introduce the next era. Only, I'm not sure what it is.
I don't even need to comment here, except to say that maybe this is some German proverb that snuck over the border. Or maybe "on time" is just relative and the point is more to never run? Ever? In your life?
week everyone!
American Kestrel 1
After capturing this photo of my middle child, Gunner, I just couldn't wait to get it scrapped. We were coloring eggs the night before Easter Sunday, and I was originally taking a group shot of my hubby and the two boys when I noticed Gunner giving up his "Cheese Face" (as I like to call it, lol). So I quick zoomed in on him and got some good ones- a rarity of late. It seems that he makes a run from the camera more now than ever- which is frustrating for a scrappy mom- I'm sure you can relate! So this was a treat for me :).
Want to know what happened to spirits consumption between 2001 and 2009?
Finch was active from 1973 to 1979, initially as Stillwater, then later as Contraband to avoid confusion with a similar ornithologically-inclined Dutch band. A number of releases document each phase throughout the '70s, but our focus here is on Finch's mid-period, a relatively brief window when three records were released on the band's own Eagle label. A debut LP, the well-regarded Thunderbird, appeared in May 1976, and was ushered in a month prior by a 45 with an album track as its A-side. Stay is not a bad song, highlighting the proggy tendencies noted elsewhere, but for Wallaby Beat purposes it's the non-LP B-side which delivers the goods.
This is UNTITLED, 2003-05, collage on book cover, by Qasim Sabti, a Baghdad artist, who rescued damaged books from the Academy of Fine Art after the lootings in the Iraq war. Sabti collected the covers of the ruined books and worked on them to create his collages. "These books challenged me to bring them back to life from their graveyard floor," says Sabti. "These works of art are my attempt to gain victory over the destruction surrounding us in Baghdad."
Oh how I miss food! I would happily murder someone for a bag of crisps. And I can't WAIT to get better to see Burlesque. And by 'better' I mean 'off the drugs so I can turn it into a drinking game in the cinema’.
Be kind anyway.
The other way that the museum makes a real difference is by engaging with the local creative and business communities. Not only does it have artists in residence who work with children to develop and showcase exhibits, it also brings in technology companies from the area to share and test new concepts with children. It was a fantastic experience, more so because of the hundreds of children actually taking part in the various activities in the museum and clearly enjoying and learning from their participation.
The difference is the ability of a few to actually build something, where the greater majority have a distinct inability to more than disassemble.
This is the point where all the little numbskulls can retort with the highly intelligent “Nuh Uh” or accuse me of trolling them, but honestly, those people are just being naive. And I can prove it, with facts. Lemme show you… do you recognize this guy?
I'm trying my best to stay positive because I know that mindset is half the battle.
The movies only showed the good parts of criminals getting beaten up. They never showed the tedious part where the hero ran around hunting down justice. It was a lonely, eerie process. Shadows leapt out at me from every direction. I gritted my teeth and pressed onwards, stepping as quietly as I could, listening for any sounds of movement. No way would I chicken out, even if I did just nearly wet myself at the newspaper rustling against the pavement. This is what I would have to do if I wanted to help Arcania’s people from the bad guys; trouble wouldn’t walk up to me and offer itself. I had to find it and that meant I couldn’t run back home with my tail tucked between my legs every time I got scared.
Anne: I am dying to get back in the studio. There is never any shortage of material, and after the last session of recording we did, which was a bit of a departure, i'm really anxious to get into a different space and experiment a bit more, leave space for some more unknown elements to emerge.
that's the way...-17, January 2007
God love, God see
Scanning the QR Code takes you to the ‘Secret Soundtrack’ website where you will be given instructions on what to do next. You will be encouraged to explore the market while listening to the audio streamed from the website, making sure not to drown out the live sounds. You can expect to hear sounds recorded from the market, reproduced in such a way as to become something new when played in conjunction with listening to the live sounds around you. It is this mixture, when experienced together, that gives you access to a secret audio world createdfrom the local environment.
Combine shrimp, olive oil, lime juice, garlic and chili/cayenne in a bowl. Marinate shrimp for up to 30 minutes. Cook shrimp (on a charcoal grill, if possible).
Surprise that special someone in your life by getting out of those flannel pajama pants and into something a bit more glamorous and feminine! Try an Olga Nightgown. They are glamorous, super comfortable, romantic and comfortable! Olga definitely knew a woman's body as she designed styles for her company. From the "Sleeping Pretty" line with built in bras, to the "Cuddle Top" which features a brushed nylon ultra soft flannel, there's a style for everyone from demure to dramatic.
Comments: Sweet jeebus, this is a wacky story! Kanigher's anthropomorphizing inanimate objects works in the war stories, but it is wildly out of place here. One thing that I do find interesting is that Kanigher gives Barry a better reason for quitting (and one that is more in line with what Lee would do with Spiderman a year later in ASM #50).
And the cars did not slow down.
My week was so busy that I didn’t have time to clear a photo pass with the band, but I took a few pics with my phone.
I was demonstrating what HDR processing can do for an image during a class I was teaching yesterday at Saints Volodymyr & Olha Church in Chicago. I was delighted to see that the HDR development setting on an iPhone 4S camera does actually improve the image in the way High Dynamic Range image processing software is supposed to.
News 1
If you'd like, you can download the Big Brother and Big Sister label here. Simply cut out the round shape and use some double sided tape to stick it on. Add some cute ribbon and you have a very affordable, but very cute, gift for an older sibling!
I seriously want to know: Do you expect creators to be "nice" or have private lives or political beliefs that you approve of? Do you think this is an unreasonable expectation?
"I am convinced that many murders are committed with police weapons."
Jake Barton … Cub Scout
When my daughter was little, many people tried to persuade her that she should go to school. For instance, her grandparents told her that it was against the law for her not to go to school, a boy at Sunday School said that she would never get a job when she grew up unless she went to school and one teenager claimed that I would be sent to prison if I did not send her to school! I was always happy for people to express such views and allowed my daughter to deal with the matter as she felt best. There were two reasons for this. First, these opinions made her think about the whole not going to school thing, which was good. Secondly, it gave her a chance to deal with ill informed individuals who were saying things which might upset her; something she is bound to encounter in later life! For the same reason, I always left her alone with the local authority officer who visited each year and I arranged for her to give her views to Graham Badman when he was investigating home education. She had far more to say to Graham Badman than I did.
Our usual thing to do after bedtime stories is to talk about her day, specifically what she was happy about, or anything that bothered her. Tonight I thought that I'd talk to her about being grateful. I told her that being grateful is feeling glad about something, like having a warm bed. I asked her if there was anything that she was grateful for. She said,
Several dozen evangelical organisations work to counter illegal sex trafficking and also to liberate women from prostitution, which in poor nations constitutes a modern form of slavery.
- 1 teaspoon of bicarb soda
But Ronald Reagan had a solution. And by the time he left office, he had solved the problem of creeping inflation increases and had actually reversed the trend: he left behind a healthy inflation rate of 4.1%.
A Boeing 747-400 passenger jet can hold 416 passengers. This blog was viewed about 2,400 times in 2010. That’s about 6 full 747s.
When the dear man did leave home, he worked at a general store while trying to catch up on his education by attending school for a year. Despite what had to be merciless teasing from children half his age, he persevered and managed to learn how to read, write and do simple math. He failed in a business he started yet still stayed in town and worked off his debts. So cute!
And, this elephant society structure dovetails nicely with advice I give to all my divorcing women clients: “Keep your girlfriends close…” It is important advice that I wish all women would heed whether they have great marriages or not. (another post…)
The picture has nothing to do with substitute teaching. I found it when Michael and I were looking through our little kid pictures for the wedding video and I thought it was pretty adorable.
I have worn flats or snow boots, leggings and knit skirts with a cardigan pretty much everyday for the last month or so...if I get out of my pajamas that is. :) Thank goodness winter coats mostly cover up my pjs during school drop off and pick up.
So Éirinn go Brách – Ireland Forever – and good cheer & sláinte (health) to you.
Did you know there is one in Dothan, AL? The only store in AL!!! Such a surprise find on the way down to Florida that we "bookmarked" it on the GPS and made sure to stop on the way back :) After arriving around 8pm, we were SO happy to be home :) Great vacation with my hubs, great time to reconnect, feel like adults and rest/recoup. Can't wait to start planning our next vacation!
Hypnosis is the original mind/body medicine. For centuries it has gone in and out of vogue. Now, in the twenty-first century, there’s finally sufficient scientific evidence, real hard data, that proves its effectiveness.
Another thing about conspiracy theorists is that most of them don’t actually have a theory you can pin them down on. They just say “Why is this?” and “Why is that?” to everything they see.
3. The people pleasers. People pleasers often tell people what they think they want to hear, rather than the truth. They want to be liked so much that they care more about producing the “right” answer in a situation than the honest answer. Little children can often fall prey to this reality.
You must use FIRM tofu, preferably Korean.
E is for Essential item you use everyday: my cell phone
In response to a query by a netizen on his Facebook, Mr Baey replied:
5.) Shit Housed Brother - This guy is a lock to be at every party you go to. He lives a few doors over, but nobody is really sure if he will even make it that far. He is running around spilling your drink and screaming at people to cannonball his handle of Captain. If you still can’t recognize him just wait, because when he invades your personal space explaining how much he loves you (guy or girl) you will know.
Below is a list of duties that we are looking for in an intern.
We having been getting books from the library every few days to keep the excitement alive in our home. We were reading a book today about cars. In it, they had pictures of all kinds of cars including a small "model car." Obviously, Joni had had a conversation in the past with Isaac about model cars because Isaac said, "Can we play with model cars, Mommy?"
they are not roots only
Served as the backup Access to Information Coordinator for the OCIO. Trained to process formal Access to Information requests
–Dr. Lafayette Loomis, November 5, 1868, Opening Exercises for Medical Department of Howard University
Palm to palm, light radiates through the pair from
the soft steps of her paws walking around the house.
Electronic – 25.8%
true from start to finish.
Once a person repents, they begin a journey of constant self-denial, changing for the better, submission to governing authorities (especially to God), learning, and a continuous building of spiritual strength and power. They are now one of the mighty warriors who endeavor to carry out their special assignment. The journey is a never-ending training process, which prepares us to meet and conquer all oppositions and tricks of the enemy. It is like training for the Olympics as to win the race in all events assigned by God. Romans 8:37 states: Nay, in all these things we are more than conquerors through him that loved us.
I occasionally have that wonderful Talking Heads "Once In a Lifetime" moment--you know, the beautiful house, beautiful wife, how did I get here moment?
However, one of the most treasured books in the box was my mother's Bible. What a surreal experience it has been to read her Bible with all the notes in the margins and highlighted passages. I would like to share something she wrote on the page of First Peter. She circled the word "grace" which appears frequently in this epistle. Her handwritten note in the margin reads as follows: "Grace - undeserved blessing of God's unfailing love, forgiveness thru Christ, divine assistance for our journey."
I'm going in...
Thanks for looking =)
Of course, things do not always go as planned. Every now and then there is a calf we cannot save. Or a set of twins where one gets left behind and we have to keep bringing it back to momma for a few days until she remembers that she has TWO babies. Or a late spring blizzard which creates mud so deep we can’t drive out to check the herd. A new calf born in those conditions needs to be brought inside and the only way to bring it in is to carry it.
SS: We knit the whole thing ourselves. It took a few days to get there so we took turns.
In defense of the 693 Brooklynites who joined the nightmare ranks of those facing foreclosure this month (and all their counterparts already suffering), I offer the latest big real estate news from Northwest Brooklyn (Manhattan): Tishman Speyer has handed the keys to Stuy-Town over to the banks who financed the $6.3 billion debacle after defaulting on the mortgage. These were not optimistic homeowners seeking a piece of the American Dream--these were, in theory and the estimation of their peers, the finest minds in finance and real estate, from Tishman to BlackRock to Merrill Lynch. In an interesting piece detailing the sale before the default, the Observer likens the rhetoric in the lead-up to the sale to vintage Bush-Cheney-Rumsfeld chatter about Iraqi WMDs. If nothing else, it illustrates the point that even the savviest dealmakers in New York City came up clueless, which adds some perspective to any critique of a Brooklyn homeowner.
I go on in. I sit in the chair. In front of the camera. I open the case and take out the first cello I’ve held since my junior year of high school. I wish I had a few minutes to see how much I remember.
His foreleg that is in back, I added W3 to dull it down and make it less intense. This helps with the illusion of depth. I colored his teeth with W3 and his tongue with E04.
Some queso!... and once again I chowed down without that last shot. Oh well. This recipe is so so good. So I will be back soon. Just email me if you miss me. I will write all my fans back, I swear.
The 70s were a lot of fun, whether you’re into 70s music, 70s lyrics, 70s retro clothes (70s fashion, 70s wigs, disco fashion, 70s costumes). If you love the 70′s, log onto www.70saturdaynight.com anytime and check out what happened on this day in history, what was #1 on this day, who’s having a birthday, trivia, and what this week’s theme will be! Plus, you can watch the video from last week’s show! Then come back Saturday for the live show, 9pm Eastern / 8pm Central time! The place to be every weekend is 70s Saturday Night!
Sunglasses: Banana Republic
Naturally, running continuously will happen gradually, but it is just how you get started. At first your running times will likely be rather short. For instance, you could run for half a minute, then walk for a few minutes, and after that run for half a minute again. But ultimately your running times will surpass your walking times till ultimately you don’t need to take any rests walking by any means. The amount of days you prepare should also be raised steadily. At first I would personally say that you need to train not more than two days a week. For the second and third week you increase this to six days per week. By around the sixth week you should be training around four days each week. By now, certainly, your running time will also have more than doubled.
slaps your calf signals you
And now we close, as we opened, with a tracking shot. We move to Davis's body, crumpled out of sight beside the wall. Up goes the camera over the wall that was separating the English from Singapore, gliding along to show us the party still in swing. A dissolve back to Davis's bedroom, with the light coming in through the slats and the breeze stirring the still-unfinished lace, then across the floor and back out to the moon, still observing as the English play out their dramas in a place that carried on fine before them and will carry on fine after they leave.
Murder, extermination, enslavement, deportation and other inhuman acts done against any civilian population, or persecutions on political, racial or religious grounds, when such acts are done or such persecutions are carried on in execution of or in connection with any crime against peace or any war crime.
Aphrodite appeared in a pink glow, and I turned into my dark form.
and I want you to know who I really am.
Pesto salmon with broccoli and dinner rolls
Last out was the Zwickel. This was also a cloudy beer with a nearly brownish colour. There was no carbonation, and the beer had a small head. I felt caramel and yeast in the nose and was not surprised when the beer tasted the same. This was a nice beer that actually reminded me of Old Speckeled Hen from bottle.
COC.
If for two consecutive accounting periods neither the Publisher nor a licensee of the Publisher has printed copies of the Work...but the Work is available for sale from the Publisher or a licensee of the Publisher by some means of on-demand printing, or electronic transmission or reproduction and within those two accounting periods, the Publisher and its licensees, collectively, have sold less than 250 copies of the Work, the Work shall be deemed out of print. Back in 2000, not everyone recognized the importance of this kind of language--I'm very fortunate to be with an agency that keeps on top of the changes in publishing and really knows its stuff.
There will be many more posts about this magical Pub and Hotel but let me start out with their side of the story, and that is the story of the fox and the anchor:
Despite some good news about the economy in recent weeks, the Daily News reported on Thursday that the number of New Yorkers losing their homes spiked in January, with Brooklynites "bearing much of the pain." Of 1,825 homeowners who received some form of eviction notice in January, 693 (or 38%) were residents of the borough of Kings. As has been typical of the housing crisis in New York and other major cities, some of the hardest-hit neighborhoods were low to middle-income communities, including Bed-Stuy, East Flatbush, and East New York. While the city as a whole lags behind the national average (one in 409 homeowners faces foreclosure in the USA), these communities, like their counterparts in Queens, have seen the gains of the recent past rolled back in a hurry as jobs, credit, and home security disappear in lockstep.
Anyway, I’ll talk more about the open class in another post. Let’s get back to the package…
None of the Lulu’s sports bras fit me (which is normally the case….don’t get it), and since buying a skirt or pair of pants without a matching top/sportsbra to go with it is just unacceptable to me, I walked out of there without any purchases.
Please get blogging with our partners at Northwood Public School from Windsor, Ontario. It’s really exciting to be talking with the other side of the world, isn’t it?
100 degrees, and not even July yet. An evening wedding seemed like a good idea at the time, but we hadn't taken into consideration that an earlier wedding would suck every bit of air conditioning out of the Caswell House. At 5:00, it was probably 85 degrees on the second floor, and me in a whalebone corset and no food since toast at breakfast. It's a wonder I was even conscious.
Then where is He now? I asked myself. Why couldn’t He just come roaring in and save me like he did last time?
So it was nice to hear some good word for AZC this week. First up, the wonderful folk at Crimespree Magazine: “You will be amused as hell, philosophically aroused and mentally sated as you wonder how Burke can pull it off. And pull it off he does. A courageous, droll and satisfying read.” - Crimespree Magazine And then, out of the blue, that very fine author Paul Johnston got in touch to say he’d read the book, and quite liked it: “Do you know how difficult it is to write a postmodern crime novel that is both funny and moving? The only person I knew to have pulled that off was Robert Coover in his imaginatively titled NOIR. Now Declan Burke has done it even more successfully in ABSOLUTE ZERO COOL. A true one-off: witty, profound, sad and ... cool as hell.” - Paul Johnston In the interest of clarity, transparency, accountability and non-Bertie Ahern-ish shenanigans, I should point out that (a) I write for Crimespree Magazine and (b) I reviewed Paul Johnston’s latest novel, THE SILVER STAIN, very positively last month - the review here is a longer version of an original that appeared in the Irish Times.
That green sticker means we can park anywhere in all of Germany!
It will make decompression easier.
* The Music of a Time That Never Was
When the book hits the street, please be assured that you will be the first to know!
The black and white material was from a 1922 Austrian silent film and washed-out coloured material was from 1960s Hercules films. The choice in matching them up, therefore, was either to try and colorize the black & white version or sepia-tint the coloured version. I chose to try colorizing. Using Adobe’s ‘colorama’ effect the first step was to turn different levels of grey into a spectrum then rotate this until the faces looked maximally flesh-coloured. This resulted in a garish magenta and red. The total was then toned down with the blue cooling Adobe Photo filter. The resulting set of colours is not too different from the current vogue of orange against blue backgrounds seen in commercial films which makes the black & white origins less obvious.
Last year, tickets were shilled on eBay at prices from $2,125 to $4,599 a day after they ran out from Apple. Meanwhile, sellers on Craigslist were asking $800 to $900 above face value.
From there, we separated the Chicks into Kristina's family's and ours. Kristina, Emma and Elsa had order a variety and were they ever cute. Visiting from California, Emma and Elsa's Great Aunt Ellie joyously joined our little parade. We oohed and aahed, taking plenty of pictures. Click click click. How precious to hold new life right there in our very own hands. How can one do anything but smile? Peep peep peep.
Unique weapon system – The skills you have access to depends on the type of weapon you are currently using. For example, when you equip a sword, you gain access to three sword skills. However, the skills have to be unlocked through constant usage of the weapon (think weapon proficiency). Changing your off-hand weapons will result in different “combination” skills appearing and it is fun to experiment and see which combinations are best suited to your playstyle.
“Concrete measures include recommending that light cases of the influenza be treated at home in order to secure hospital beds for serious cases, and sending doctors who had focused on quarantine measures back to their medical fields.”
This WordArt request is from Elaine. She thinks it's a song from "Happily 'Never After" (I haven't seen the movie, but my kids LOVE it), by They Might Be Giants. I thought it was a GREAT quote, so I made it up for her. She wanted to use it in her living room, with pictures of her family. Awe, what a WONDERFUL idea! Be sure and send me pics when you get it up! Sounds awesome :)
Add the remaining oil if necessary and stir-fry the garlic and red onion for 30 seconds or until the garlic is golden.
Obviously I’m all for trains. And obviously there is very little point in constructing a massive nationwide railway network in Iceland when 60% of the country’s population live in 1% of its area. But that’s precisely why it could well be a good idea to build a railway. Iceland is well connected in terms of airports, with a significant amount of domestic travel done by flying. The problem is that, while Keflavik is the main international hub, all domestic flights to and from the capital are from Reykjavik Airport in the city. Giving these people, as well as all those heading to the capital, direct access from one airport to another, without getting stuck in the increasing road traffic, is phenomenally important, as any good airport operator will tell you.
And when my eyes adjusted, to the flashin of his smile;
Richard: “Charming everybody else to take care of me. Maybe I should grow drugs.”
Giving children the chance to experiment a little will help them to develop their own strengths and interests. They will possibly even hone their fine motor skills in the process. Taking away some of the “recommended” rules that limit exploration can give little ones more room and opportunity in which to grow and learn.
While I'm giving this story three stars which means, "I liked it," I can honestly say there were some things I liked and some that I really didn't appreciate or like very much. A true rating is probably closer to 2.5 stars because I disliked more than I liked, but I did finish the book so I wasn't bored out of my mind, which is a good thing.
The world is falling apart, what with hunger, disease and oppression. But never fear, as long as I’m in power, our door is always open to those in need.
Justin's mom came over to pick up Cady and then take her to the lake for the day. I cried. As did I the night before. We left out and stopped for lunch in Texarkana in hopes of meeting up with my college roomie, Cindy, before heading out. We were able to squeeze in a few minutes of chatting before heading out. We drove just south of Houston to the Nasa area for our overnight stay. Traffic was great until 8 miles to our hotel and was stop and go until then. C'est la vie. Then we topped off the night at Olive Garden with a gift card. Free dinner! Woo hoo!
So, today I am delighted to announce that I have been invited to be a Guest Designer for the 'Spotlight On ...' feature over at the Crafty Cardmakers challenge blog. This week's spotlight is falling on digital stamping - right up my street, as you will know! So, without further ado, here's what I came up with:
Nina's threads are very pretty, with subtle variation in color. You can see more of them on her site ~ click here. Oh, and she is making pretty jewelry too ~ must see!
Each bite was delicious, filled with gooey cheese covered spicy chicken. The bread wasn’t overcooked, but perfectly done, it having soaked up the excess wing sauce. The chicken didn’t dry out between having seared and then baking it and it, too, soaked up the wing sauce. The sauce itself was still spicy, leaving my lips tingling and my eyes watering only slightly even after it had cooled off completely. And, it wasn’t until I had a handful of bites until I was done, but I got the idea to try it with BBQ sauce (“It is a chicken calzone, isn’t it?”). It was the perfect marriage of flavours, honestly. Tangy, smoky barbecue with spicy, chicken and cheese. While eating, it inspired a new recipe that I will have to write down before it evades me.
By the time I was ready for clean up it was 1AM and I was spent.
Church-going Americans are not only going in debt for war, they supply their sons and daughters to be killed and maimed in the contest. Celebrity Zionists beat the drums for war that Israel wants, but I have not heard of Hagee’s or Farwell’s son enlisting, or any of the congressmen’s children. The scorched foot soldiers in Iraq and Afghanistan include a disproportionately large number of Judeo-Christians, who we believe, often enlist because mom and dad raised him in the Judeo-Christian church where volunteering is considered noble, even today after Abu Ghraib and Guantanamo. Their youths are taught that if we honor Israel we earn blessings for America from God. It is these young men who pay with shattered bodies and broken minds for the free junkets to Israel taken by a reported 80 Congressmen in August 2007.
3D mount tape
Beginning in January 2012, it is now possible for a poet to perform at as many as five poetry series in rapid succession beginning on the third Wednesday of the month: the new Bill Brown’s 1-2-3 Slam Toronto (Wednesday); Burlington Slam Project (Thursday); London Poetry Slam (Friday); Guelph Poetry Slam (Saturday) and the new YorkSlam (in Markham the following Wednesday).
Across the street from where we live is an empty plot of land. When we moved in, the land was barren; the usual desert natural landscape with a few desert shrubs and lots of tumbleweeds. Suddenly, there was activity with bulldozers, blades attached, merrily scraping the plot of land; leveling the surface. Right now there is silence, but, soon we will have a parade of construction workers, pouring, pounding and building.
he declared
Evolved - Self Manufacture Unique Goods and sell only Retail:
Having been married for nearly 10 years I’ve gotten way more accustomed to the 10 minute romp. Let’s sneak this in before we fall asleep, kids walk in, or let’s just get it done out of obligation. Not so romantic. We already know what makes eachother tick. There is no more discovery, boredom has slipped in, and at times some minor disgust. Hence this relationship was not ever one of sexual satisfaction.
Robert J. Foti, 42, Albertson, N.Y.
During their month-long stay at Big Bass Lake, the six radical Muslims – - all foreign-born and in their 20s, rented a public firing range to practice attacks on the military base.
Part 2: Isaiah 53 in Biblical Theology
I am definitely doing this, just need to wait until I get Kaylicious and Zazu's gifts all wrapped and under the tree, so I can snap a photo! They're going to love it! I will post our photo here once it's done!
than this pathetic fool could ever muster
Lately I've been so busy...work is crazy and I decided to do a weekend art show. Well, needless to say...the middle of August is not the best time to try it out! Wow was it hot! But I did have a lot of fun. My daughter Emily went with me...and helped me soooooo much.
Street Light Range – Endura Cityliner S60 street light is available in 60W power with cool white color. It comes in adjustable installations. It is perfectly suited for Sidewalks, Road Lighting, Urban lighting, Public places, Parking Areas, etc. Price range Rs. 75,000/-.
Battlestormfrom Singapore made a rather quiet entrance, but soon picked up the pace with their brand of Black/death metal. Main man ‘Hades’ (I googled them) was one of a group of skin headed, monster Singaporean chaps present at the event. I don’t know what they put in the water where they live, but it produces monsters. Three of them were standing at the right hand side of the pit during Remains, and
Actual Spiral Dance in Asheville, NC in 2007.
Crave for spring that is life,
We are so excited to share our news with everyone!
(Please ignore my hair, I'm deep in the awkward-growing-out stage)
This weekend is the first time Pittman and I will be leaving the offspring overnight. Ever. I feel excited and a bit freaked out all at the same time. And, I know what you're thinking. She'll be fine! Don't worry! She'll be fine!... Here's the thing. I actually don't believe that something terrible will happen. Is it a fear? Yes. Of course. But I know we are leaving her in capable hands and you know what, dammit? I have the right to worry and cry about it. Eighteen months of raising a human day in and out has earned me these emotions and I plan to exercise them as I prepare for the weekend.
NOTE: You want to make sure that your seam is to the left of your 'gathering seams -
Sassy Studio Design's gave the DT some gorgeous images to play with, Steampunk Victoria & Wonder Regan. Thank You!
This all seems so true if you think about it. As women, we spend most of our lives wanting and yearning for our own Prince Charming. But do we ever really find him? Or do we find him only let him go because he doesn’t seem to match that perfect ideal guy?
These are the ones who continue still to this day to teach the masses the Good News. All we have to do is pick up the book and read it. Ponder on it. Read some more and read it daily and often. This is how we abide in Him. Through prayer and through sitting still and waiting upon Him, letting His word speak to us, rather than us speaking to His word, we can become connected in a more intimate way. He will never fail us.
(3 gifts loud)
· Richard Bishop, partner, Red Light Management Electronic Division
We've learned he naps better if it's black in his room, so we've put up a sheet over his blinds to really make it a baby cave. Whatever works!
My Princess Warrior
Embrace reality when talking about the game. It’s obvious that a Bears fan and a Packers fan are going to have their differences, but if the Packers are 11-0, chances are, they don’t suck. I hate it when people confuse “don’t like” with “suck”. I may hate the Patriots (OK, I really hate the Patriots), but they definitely don’t suck. I hate them because they are so successful, especially against my team.
That all changed as Joe Elliott, Kurt Cobain, Michael Hutchence, Tom Cruise and others decided to give me an unwanted lesson in “sex ed”. Kurt Cobain even had a photo layout of him completely nude on a red silk sheet in a similar fashion to Marilyn Monroe’s famous photo. Masturbation, pregnancy prevention, and sex toys seemed to be a hot topic and I used when making up songs, such as, Darling Nikki, Erotic City for Prince, I Touch Myself for the Australian Divinyls and friends of Michael Hutchence.
2010.08.07 Iraq Basra 43 185 Over forty people are massacred by Islamic terrorists at a market. Most burn to death in a fire caused by bombs.
Everyone needs our forgiveness, understanding, kindness, love and prayers. I am simply saying that by distancing yourself, you save them from being the receiving end of your anger. Try to solve the problem at a later date, and if it can’t be solved, let it go and move onto other healthier activities.
Close your great big eyes;
intense attention on you
- Another, more minor problem, was the zipper bag. When I first put the ice cream base in the bag, it sprang a leak and I had to quickly put it all into another bag. I then emptied the bags in an effort to fix my ice cream base, and when it came time for the ice bath (again) I skipped the plastic bag method. I chilled the base in my usual manner: poured it into a metal bowl set into a bigger bowl of ice water, cooled for a bit then placed into the fridge to cool further. When the base was below 50 degrees I churned it.
Then one of our venues in Hanover Park had no functioning telephone line but the Auntie across the road stepped in and let us use her telephone line!
Where is the LOVE? = By Black Eye Piece
You do not believe Malema’s call to nationalise the mines? This guy articulates what the hoi polloi are thinking, but the ANC leadership will not say yet. The tactic is to set the bar high, then lower it and the victims will sigh with relief and say it could have been worse. So perhaps it will not be total nationalisation but rather 51%, a’ la Zim. Just look north for revelation, Zuma does.
Troy discovers he and Shay are really married and asks for five months to prove his love to her. She’s been hurt so often and so deeply she often assumes wrong data so doesn’t trustTroy nor ask him about suspicious incidents.
This morning, I simply rinsed my face with hot water in the shower and then splashed it with cold (to shrink the pores), gently towel-dried, and applied just a smidge of my Aloette daytime moisturizer (it has SPF 15). I'm hoping to eventually not need any moisturizer at all but we will see. My face is super soft and glowy today. Will definitely keep you updated on my progress with this!
Anyone who loves to skateboard, will find these just plain fun to roll on. Whether its cruising to a skate spot, bombing a hill, getting around town, skating to a bar, or riding your way around campus in-between classes, Stereo’s Vinyl Series Skateboards come complete and ready to roll. Stash it in your backpack, car trunk, or locker when you’re not skating it. Stereo wants you to feel what they have been experiencing for the last 20 years… a cruiser board under your feet, music, skateboarding, and having fun the whole time. Enjoy. 22.5” in length and 6” in width. Stereo embedded at top in circle design. Free sunglasses and sticker pack included.
Next the page talks about the various base ideas such how there is a moderator who in the fine tradition of rename what they are called in every game is name the "Labyrinth Lord" who runs the world and all the Non Player Characters (NPC). While the other players each get to control a Player Character (PC) who is their in-game alter ego. All real basic stuff for roleplaying games really but it no one says it how are there supposed to be new players coming into the hobby.
This is the short story of 5 minutes in G's shoes.
14.07.08 US Chicago, House Show
Orange indicates thoughtfulness and consideration of others. Golden orange is vital and indicates self control and creativity. Brown orange shows a lack of ambition and a don't care attitude.
Pringle says on his Presence Conference website,
"Which of the three do you think was a neighbor to the man who was attacked by robbers?"
There are several key questions an author must ask themselves before embarking on their journey through self-publishing, whether they are prepared to go it alone or utilise an author solutions company to do the job for them.
Personally, when I got into blogging in 2008, my mentor, Jomar Hilario, said that WordPress is for experienced bloggers because WordPress is more technical. So when Sir Jomar said that I should have a WordPress blog (as a graduate of the VA Seminar last 2010), I got scared. But I had to do it because Sir Jomar said possible clients will see advantages in a VA with a WordPress blog. Because Sir Jomar’s tutorials, I have been in WordPress for two years now.
looking at this tree, i think to myself: are you dead? do you walk the same path every day, but never grow, never change? what is different about your life? do you have life? are you living the life you were meant to live? are you accomplishing your purpose? do you know the One who gives life? are you building relationship with Him and loving others each day? each day is a new journey, a new step, a choice to grow, to change, to experience or to not.
Well, I’m only going to do 3 types of decks today, but I’ll be doing more before Friday if I have the time. I’ll be focusing on Human decks, GR Beatdown, Token, and other possibly new metagame decks in my next post. Thanks for reading, and if you think there are other cards that will be played in these decks, be sure to share them with us here!
the closet and grab that one box with all your pics.
+ BLACK MOON – Total Eclipse
Kiawah Island is a tiered system of colleges in South Carolina. You can tour the south carolina windpool of Charleston, for example, was founded in 1770 and is the south carolina windpool in default it will be suspended for thirty days of your arrest, and if you choose to go up drastically, however the south carolina windpool opposite has happened.
We were feeling aftershocks and this was something new to chennaites.
'I ran inside to call the ambulance and he sat outside on a stool. 'I came out and tied his arm up with a belt and towels, the ambulance people talked me through it. 'But through it all he sat there talking away like it was normal. When the ambulance came they put him on a stretcher and asked where the arm was.
Viewed in their context, these passages indicate clearly that early Christians believed Jesus was ruling, not waiting. The entire basis of their confidence in salvation and forgiveness of sins was based on their understanding that they had a ruling high priest who could actively plead for them, that the glorified Jesus was in heaven, sitting at God’s right hand, that is, ruling with His Father’s full support, possessing complete authority to act on their behalf.
Yeah, across the board. It was one of those things where we love reggae, and we have a reggae remix outfit called Radio Riddler. We’ve remixed a lot of people…Lily Allen, Coldplay…you know, we’ve done a lot of remixes for a lot of people. So we thought, what can we do? He went – “Why don’t we do the soundtrack to ‘Purple Rain’?” I was like – “That won’t work, that won’t happen, it just won’t work”. He was like – “Well, let’s give it a go”, and he did the first one, ‘Purple Rain’, he got the beats ready and sent it to me, and I was like – “Fuck! It sounds great!” Then I got a lot of my hometown players, brass sections, people from The Specials playing on there. I sang all the songs but then it was like – “Let’s get some guest artists on it”. So I started to approach different people and one person I approached was Sinéad O'Connor. She hasn’t sung a Prince song since ‘Nothing Compares 2 U’ which was an international number one so I didn’t think she’d go for it. But she did, and did a version of ‘I Would Die 4 U’. Amazing. Then we’ve got Plan B, he’s doing one, Madness are doing one, the singer from UB40’s doing one. So, yeah, that’s a great little project we’ve got going.The album release has been delayed in part to complications in getting publishing approval from Prince and his camp, who are notoriously picky about anyone recording covers of his back catalog. That said, all indications suggest its just a matter of time before the tracks see the light of day.
Would like to thank my two new followers
Chandler: You don't think I get up when you get up?
ok so that was a bad example, but you get the idea.
I obtained on inter-library loan the volume Giuseppe Settele, Il Suo Diario e la Questione Galileiana (ed. P. Maffei, Foligno: Edizioni dell’Arquata, 1987). It includes a facsimile reproduction of the original work by Fr. Maurizio Benedetto Olivieri, issuing from “Suprema Sacra Congregazione del S. Officio” (p. 425) and he signs himself “Commissario” (p. 449). Note, of the Congregation of the Holy Office, not of the Congregation of the Index as Bob contended. Witness also Dr. Maurice Finocchiaro, one of the most eminent Galileo scholars: “Maurizio Benedetto Olivieri (1769–1845), a Dominican friar, professor of Old Testament at the same university, and Inquisition consultant; in July 1820 he became commissary general of the Inquisition and held that position until his death” (Finocchiaro, Retrying Galileo, 193; my emphasis). Here are more sources:
What if there were teens whose lives depended on being bad influences? This is life for sons and daughters of fallen angels in Sweet Evil.
Almost three quarters of the active duty military, those that have to do the fighting, more than all other candidates and (Obama?) combined together, support Dr. Ron Paul. And yet, we here at home hear the never ending beat of the war drums, and that Ron Paul would be detrimental to the military and our national defense. When I heard the people's booing Romney or Gingrich echoing in the past when they spoke about the military and the "Iran Threat" or they were "Bad Americans," I realized why Ron Paul wasn't among the GOP favorites. Those that are against Dr. Paul are the ones that sent our young people into harms way and really want to start yet another war. These Warmongers are the ones that ridicule and ostracize Ron Paul.
Blue Valentine is, all in all, not a bad film, really. But this weekend, I know I'll be seeing better ones!
Do you know that I have lived in Melbourne my whole entire life and I’ve never even been to Phillip Island, let alone seen the penguins strut their stuff along the sand in front of 8000 snap-happy tourists? This must happen. Because penguins are in my top 5 favourite animals of all time.
The channels, though, have clogged up. Really badly. I tried dipping my toe into Goodreads when I published 'Heaven Can Wait', but I couldn't find a single group that I thought contained more book-buying readers than book-selling authors (and yes, authors buy lots of books, but they don't go on Goodreads to find books to buy, they go there to find readers to sell to, and I was as guilty of this as anyone else). The only people I communicate with on Twitter that I feel are likely to buy my book are authors, most of them pushing their own writings.
Some see a healer
The 30-year fixed mortgage slipped to 4.05 percent, a drop from last week’s 4.09 percent.
FMX 2012
He looks at me, frowns. He seems perplexed. “Tell ‘em you’re nine.”
So although, the enormous egg did not turn out to be a dinosaur (*sigh*) it did turn out to be a full-sized yummy breakfast, and when you’re an adult who *knows* in her heart that dinosaurs really can’t come from chicken eggs (or at least acknowledges that no one to this day has definitively proved that that can’t happen…) sometimes, just sometimes, that pan of eggs can be just as good.
To see how the BBC edits to destroy those who say the wrong things.
Another advantage of audiobooks is that you can do other things whilst listening, like driving, cooking, washing dishes, shopping, talking to your spouse or significant other or others. It is here when the ‘skills’ come into the equation. –You have to learn how to concentrate (or not) on two things at the same time. If you master it, no reader however snobbish can ever say that audiobooking is lazy. It requires years of training, like trying to train your mind to not do anything in meditation. I personally am a novice since I haven’t mastered the ‘talking to someone’ while listening to an audiobook. My conversations while listening to them goes like this:
It got me thinking...
Is a piece of driftwood
Some of the songs aren’t from those years – most remarkably the one ADELE song on the list – but they’ve all got the tone I’m trying to achieve in Half-Sized Tiger. I also included some links to YouTube videos – official videos by the artists, fan videos using footage from Toradora!, and non-official fan videos as well.
#2- I sent my outline instead of my synopsis. This will be obvious since it tells the whole story, and not too imaginatively either. Yikes!
We'd gotten a late start, as I meantioned. The football team had been busy getting whomped; it was almost eleven before we got on the road.
The animation is faithful to Natsume Ono’s unique and original artwork and that’s a very good thing seeing as it makes for a visually interesting anime series. Although it’s not available on Blu-ray, the series still manages to shine on DVD either way.
But The health dpt score was 92
but all eyes turn your way.
Perpetual motion, the image won’t focus
Bawd
Most of us live in cramped apartments and on top of it... Parisian buildings are crammed like sardines into a teeeeny tiny city compared to similar European hot spots. The result? We live so close to our neighbors that sometimes it can feel like we live WITH them... sorry Martha, but that's not always a good thing. (Especially given the bubbly warmth of Parisians in general.)
"Half the club smells like weed."
I can remember a time when my room was the cleanest in the house. It was a very short time. And probably right before I left for college.
The white spikes are the parasitic fungus that killed this moth.
When you awaken in the morning's hush,
That struggles for form and wings,
“How come minority members of the House have not transitioned to the Senate the way you see white members transition?” King asked. “One of the answers is the districts they represent tend to be different from the state as a whole. They tend to represent urban districts with high minority populations.”
It is their encounter, at first based on deception and ultimately based on their need for true human affection, that is at the heart of this film. Naturally the spectacularly-filmed and very unsettling bird attacks - especially on young children - catch the viewer's attention. But without the human element to this story, the bird attacks would stand out as a gimmick. For years after, this film, thanks to its disturbing theme - animals being unleashed on humans - inspired several other movies with similar subject matters, be it monkeys or lions or even in one instance, killer frogs in the infamous Frogs (1972). The creators of such films were in for a cheap buck, thinking that humans being eaten by animals would be good for some instant thrills as well as a few laughs.
“Reykjavík! were an immense fireball, a sickeningly brilliant reconstruction of modern rock so majestic and pure that it was difficult to watch and even harder to describe.’ - Sindri Eldon, Reykjavík Grapevine
-Don't say, "He/She is in a better place." What better place is there than in my arms? How is it better that my child is in heaven than with his mommy and daddy? How is that better? Since you want what is best for your children too, would you rather have your child in heaven?...Didn't think so.
a deep, reconciling embrace
teas that smell of fruit and spice, when brewing
Nicole Sconiers, Author-is also a screenwriter living in the sunny jungle of L.A. She holds an MFA in creative writing from Antioch University Los Angeles, and she recently published Escape from Beckyville: Tales of Race, Hair and Rage. Visit her: http://nicolesconiers.com/index.html
“We know that there are some people who still don’t understand or don’t agree with the idea of removing this type of discrimination,” Hanson-Young said. “I am absolutely optimistic that we have a very good chance by the end of this year to be able to look back and say, ‘We did it’.”
Hopefully the Delhi High Court will evolve such a format for the copyright infringement suits filed by PPL and IPRS.
Nancy Rue has worked as a public school teacher, church youth director, theater workshop developer and camp director. She has written more than eighty books for young people, including the beloved Faithgirlz! Sophie series, The Skin You're In and Everybody Tells Me to Be Myself but I Don't Know Who I Am. Nancy lives with her husband and two dogs in Lebanon, TN.
Quit making this wonderful project about personal issues, personal biases and personal caveats. The IDEA behind it is a great one. It has the potential to combine rather than divide people.
Because of the heat we had these last couple of days I started to develop a serious headache. I took something to help me and gave it some time to do it's work before I start my Burn the Fat, Feed the Muscle training program. Then all of a sudden I had a bad encounter with a pepper ball shot from a Gas gun. I don't really want to say out loud who caused the accident, but my father now knows how the safety switch works lol. After having to clear the house and trying to recover from the burning eyes and chest we started our program.
The witch painting is packed with mixed media including
He said there is mommy driving off in her car to go to work, and they are standing at the house with the babysitter waving. Amazing less than a year ago he couldn't make a stick figure.
He was fifteen years my senior and had a lot of medical problems aside from myeloma. Ultimately his kidneys were destroyed, he was on dialysis, his heart was diseased, and he had trouble getting around most days. While his condition dictated that he could no longer go hunting or fishing or walking in the woods that he loved so much, it was okay, though, because he quipped that he was ‘filled-up with enough outdoor memories to last two lifetimes!’
c ) You calmly walk to the kitchen, open the refrigerator and hope that bottle of wine is still there.
(I must credit Wikipedia for these drawings;
She loves the bling - like all little girls that are 11 going on 20 - but don't give her anything with pink on it! So I did the stars in all different colors - but certainly NO PINK! The sentiment is from SU. She really is a magnificent little girl - I know I'm a tad prejudice but that's ok too!
And I've already forgotten the terror.
E's response: Because Christmas is a Holiday with real meaning. It's about a real person, Jesus. It's about his birth. And I like that we have a day we can celebrate Jesus.
for shelter once the sun went down and the shops closed up. The scent of rain
DW: And that’s also why Jay Rockefeller wasn’t allowed in.
I’m forgetting everything. Losing things, zoning out on people. Interrupting them.
It was April or May 2011 and I was pegging out the washing when it came to me. A retreat. A writing retreat. That was exactly what I needed to get my thoughts in order and to get some words down on the page. Peace, quiet, just me and my laptop and nothing else.
But enough about my nostalgic quest, these rolls were awesome in their own right. The walnuts and cranberries are always a great flavor combo, and the softness and stretchiness of the bread made these some of the best rolls to come out of my oven. They made a really welcome and enjoyable addition to Thanksgiving dinner and next-day breakfast, both by themselves or slathered with butter.
– 12 FL “Stand Your Ground” Cases Protected People Who Pursued Others
1 Peter 3:18; “For Christ, once, hath also suffered for our sins, the just for the unjust, that He might bring us to God, being put to death in the flesh, but quickened in the Spirit.”
Now the only people I see regularly are my brother and his wife (who live nearby) and a few casual acquaintances I’ve made outside pubs. Most of the people I now think of as friends are to be found here on my blog, or elsewhere online.
I remember Mama lighting the Menorah,
1. What inspired the Zan Gah series?
As mentioned in the post about my birthday party, one of the wonderful presents I got was a Kindle. My sister has one, too, and she created a shared account for it on Amazon, where I have created a wish list to which both of us can add books we want to download eventually.
Some of the drugs allegedly sold by the officers included 198kg cocaine they allegedly stole at OR Tambo International Airport in October 2007. They got R1425000 for the haul.
It's a quote from one of my favorite movies ever: Forrest Gump. It came to me at 5:00 this morning, as my mind was racing while I should have been sleeping. Remember the part of that movie when Forrest starts running across the country? That was what I felt like about eight months ago when I started posting on here. I felt compelled to write, so I wrote. And sort of like Forrest, but on a much smaller scale, I attracted some attention along the way. Some people started following me. My writing even inspired a few people (I've been told).
This was my interpretation of a tiki commission sculpture that I'm doing for some folks in the California bay area. Funny that I never thought of myself as much of a drawing artist but looking at the photo I don't think that it's too bad. It will be a few months before I'll get this guy created and then I'll post some photos of it to my Website.
“Cristobal Silverio came illegally from Oxtotilan, Mexico, in 1997 and brought his wife Felipa, plus three children aged 19, 12 and 8. Felipa ... gave birth to a new daughter, her anchor baby, named Flor. Flor was premature, spent three months in the neonatal incubator, and cost San Joaquin Hospital more than $300,000. Meanwhile, (Felipa’s 19-year-old daughter) Lourdes plus her illegal alien husband produced their own anchor baby, Esmeralda. Grandma Felipa created a second anchor baby, Cristian. ... The two Silverio anchor babies generate $1,000 per month in public welfare funding. Flor gets $600 per month for asthma. Healthy Cristian gets $400. Cristobal and Felipa last year earned $18,000 picking fruit. Flor and Cristian were paid $12,000 for being anchor babies.”
I have a green and brown scarf on my needles at the moment. Pictures will come when it's all done and ready to list. I'm also working a shawl with my pineapple shawl pattern in a laceweight virgin wool yarn I picked up in a thrift store a while back. This is in addition to the Queen Anne's Lace doily I'm still working on, the needlepoint homework I'm not quite keeping up with, being driven mad by a handful of fruit flies, and continuing a little story writing on the side.
“Doubtful.” Jack replied. “My parent’s have been gone so long I barely remember them. My mother anyway, my father was never in any of the stories.” Mattie mulled over the meaning of a “freelance ethereal granting whatever” while considering a change in seat beside Khakis but despite her best instincts for self preservation and last possible chance at keeping some quiet she could not help but continue listen as Jack produced his business card from the inside pocket of his jacket. “Nothing special, you can get them printed for free on the internet.” he humbly apologized as she took the card from between his fingers and confirmed Sundance’s apparent career title,
Have a crafty weekend everyone and don't forget to check out the linky party page up top~
Winter Is Coming: It’s kind of hard to actually review this series because the one thing that I can guarantee about it is that so much seems to happen and largely at times, all at once. For some people, a series with this much going on might be a worrying thing but you have to admire the confidence in which this series goes about it’s multitude of storylines.
You're a horrible child.. Mom's at home, crying, sockless. You could have at least made her life just a touch happier had you Chihuahua'd her feet or something, but no... you had to spen the day reading a blog about socks.
If you really knew me YOU would know I am the person I am because of the choices I’ve made and because of people in my life. NOT because of the way I look.
In this age of mediocrity and great compromise, it is not surprising that no one in this country ever attempts to offer a moral defense of capitalism and expose the evil of altruism and collectivism. The philosophy of both the mystics of muscle (communists/fascists) and the mystics of spirit (theocrats/religionists) is based on the morality of altruism, and the only corollary of the socio-political struggle of either group is collectivism.
Isn't she just so much fun??? If you love this image as much as I do check out the whole collection by Elisabeth Bell for SCACD called The Odds & Ends Sampler. This whole set is just tooo adorable!!!
Good communication is essential and has always resulted in good business dealings as well as securing lifetime clients. Sometimes in order to communicate efficiently one must do so in the language of those we serve. It is not a matter of not being true to who we are and our origins, but expanding who we have been up to now as a business entity, in order to reach a broader market. It is good business, therefore it makes sense now more than ever to translate our businesses and services into Spanish. This is especially true for businesses offered at a national level.
Very used to it. If you haven’t been spit up, puked, peed, and pooped on by the time your kid reaches their first birthday, you must have three nannies. (And in that case, stop reading now and give them a raise.) As a bonus tip, carry the following items in the car at all times:
Inevitably something will trigger an idea or a solution to a problem in the plot.
Strangely, I am blocked in writing this blog right now. I wonder if this means I should stop or keep on eking out these little fragments? (do you eke? eek? is this even a word?) Yet I am spurting forth today, the essay book. Actually this is causing me some anxiety, the flow. I am dangerously writing TOO much, I am being TOO excessive, this book about the excessive. Although to me the flow the purge is better than the block. At least psychically. Yesterday....NOTHING came. And I wrapped myself in melancholy, I sobbed in the shower, I went to the Whole Foods and sat outside in the 80-something heat and ate vegan egg rolls. I bought guacomole and almond milk chocolate ice cream. I think I'm getting my period. But sometimes this life of being alone and writing is absolutely agonizing. I want to be done with the book, and take a break, and go to coffeeshops and read. That's all I want to do, is go to a coffeeshop and read Thomas Bernhard novels or something. I'm not very good at working too much, staying disciplined for too long. Like today, I had a good day, then I crawled in bed and watched Glee. I don't even like Glee.
Well, if you are familiar with XBox Live Arcade, or whatever PS3 is calling their thingy at the moment (Home, maybe?), you may have come across a game called Pinball FX2. Quite plainly, this is the greatest pinball video game ever. Their tables are dynamic and VERY interactive. The graphics are great. And, most importantly, the physics are spot on. It feels like you are playing pinball. The game is “free”, but then you have to buy table packages (you can try any table for free with a full time-based demo). Tables run somewhere around $3.00 individually and $10.00 for a pre-pack of 4.
The hijab is most often related to the topic of modesty and morality. At the mention of the word, one automatically pictures women in flowing, loose gowns carefully tailored not to give away any details of the body, with extra-large jilbabs (head dress) to match, preferably with an extra piece of cloth that covers the face, too.
Number one - County Chart; Number 29 - Pop Chart
35. By 60 years of age, 60-percent of men and 40-percent of women will snore.
Gillian recently travelled to Jordan with a group of other women and a very handsome man (!) and explored, shared and photographed her way through her all to brief time there. The choice of photographs, the journal of what she saw, what she felt and how she was captivated leaps off the pages of her blog.
My hubby has written me many poems over the years, I finally pulled some of them out of the box in my closet and did something nice with them. Must be all that romantic paper getting me in a mushy mood!
North Coast Brewing Co
Now, here's this week's new digital stamp for your crafting pleasure. In honor of upcoming St. Valentine's Day, today's image is a Conversation Heart...you know, those little pastel candies that express mini sentiments o' love. Have fun with it and stop back tomorrow for another!
what a lovely surprise to get home, sign onto my blog to find out that I have made the Top 3 at Fashionable Stamping challenge with the birthday card that I made for my dad. The challenge was embossing and I am so chuffed to have had my card picked I will have to ring my dad to let him know.
You’re Immature
I nod. “She killed herself when we were sixteen.”
One night after the juke joint with Dragon Lady, I did vent. All the anger about the circumstance of the break-up from the jewel-eyed girl and its subsequent shrapnel bubbled to the surface in a beer and whiskey-lanced rant. Madam Lung for the most part just listened, allowing me to purge my ire to small hours shadows.
Smelly Carlson (You guessed it.) said, “I got an idea; lets just move those barrels to Hawg Creek Springs and maybe they’ll tar and chip over there instead of here.”
So instead of writing a blog post last night, I had a cocktail and shortcake with Jackie and Jean. But those are J names... and today is a J day... and our little trio is special. And yes, you may take that multiple ways. But the way I'm going to TELL you about is, THIS is my Couch to Keg team.
While the bird attacks were the primary focus for many in the audience, the film is, in the final analysis, an argument from Hitchcock on the need for love. We are introduced at once to Melanie Daniels (Tippi Hedren), an attractive, young socialite living in San Francisco, where her father is an editor for one of the city's daily papers. She enters a pet store to purchase a mynah bird and while waiting, encounters Mitch Brenner (Rod Taylor), a defense attorney who has come to purchase a pair of love birds as a birthday present for his 11-year old sister (nice touch right off the bat of love birds being part of the symbolism that drives the story). Brenner, upon seeing Daniels standing alone at a counter, plays a trick on her, asking her for advice on birds, knowing full well who she is. Daniels, not realizing that he knows she is not a sales clerk, does her best to help him, but fails in her efforts. Upon learning of Brenner's deception, she insults him and instantly imagines getting even with him. As he leaves, she runs outside, sees his license plate number and thanks to her father's connections, learns who he is and where he lives.
“Well, then,” he said.
-Swam in a mountain lake
Hare Krishna/Be-In
BrewDog will be at the GBBF this August but only after they adhered to certain concrete conditions.
He now rolls over both ways. He mastered those skills over the course of two days. He's getting close to sitting up. He's pretty good at it right now, except for that impulse to throw himself backward. We thought he was teething the other day, but he may have just had a summer cold.
The other good thing I need to mention is due to my work with vInspired, I received a certificate on Tuesday assessing my role throughout the night, what skills I had demonstrated and what others thought of me during the night. It played an important role when I went to Birmingham. After all of this I think I need to lay down. Keep checking and you will see more of what is going on.
Andrea Della Bella, 59, Jersey City, N.J.
Again, I didn’t get what I sought from the interlinear Bible, but in any case Daniel makes it clear that his diet (which I believe to be already an abstemious one) became even more restricted. Here in chapter 10, he is actually fasting. The commentators have queued up to explain the types of bread that he would have forsaken – and all the rest of it.
I regret ever feeling that I was only worth sexual acts.
1 ½ sticks (12 Tbsp.) cold unsalted butter, cut into small pieces
I am launching a new blog to organize all of my poetry and photos that I want to keep...forever! Most of what I've loaded so far has been old poetry from the last five years. I have all of my poetry scattered amongst five or so computers and I am slowly unloading them all into a format that will be easy to read and navigate! Fair warning: I didn't claim to be any good at writing poetry, I just have found it an outlet in the past. My muse occasionally visits now and again, but not much lately. I hope to change that for 2011. Some reads are a little dark (depressing if you will), while others are more full of life.
Steve Nelson is the writer and offers an interesting astrological perspective for all to ponder.
A MILLION DISPOSSESSED SOULS
I was at your mercy…
”God dammit” he mumbled under his breath. He looked around expecting someone to come help him up but he was alone. His back was already throbbing and it took him a minute to pull himself up. He looked back at his car, contemplating going home. But he knew his wife would give him a lecture and he didn’t need that on top of this pain.
It's finally my turn to show you all the fun I had with my awesome Gilli stamps. I decided to make something other then a card, so I made this super cute candy bar holder. I can't wait to give it to someone special. For the challenge you have to use 3 pattern papers,2 punches or die cuts,and 1 form of bling. First and for most the Gilli I decided to showcased is called Bloomers. My 3 pattern papers are the red with hearts in the background, the pink with a tone on tone pattern, and the white with the pink pattern. My 2 punches are the felt flower,made from a circle nestibilities, and the MS border punch. My bling is I-Rock mirrors. Well I couldn't stop there so I did a matching card and put Gilli on the Card not the candy bar holder. Well that's all for now. I hope you come and check out the other Design Teams work at House of Gilli.
In celebration this month, I am having a giveaway to my followers.
2) A man’s heart is like a puzzle, any woman can do it provided that she puts the right piece in the right place.
Playing with her short dark hair, as she always did when she was nervous, she frowned slightly as the girl behind the bar licked her lips and brushed her hand against Robbie’s arm as she passed him his change. He ignored her though, making Rachel smile as he rolled his eyes theatrically, unseen by the barmaid who was looking at him appreciatively as he walked away.
Stallone plays Freddy Heflin in Copland, an oafish loser cop whos the sheriff of Garrison, a town populated by cops most of them dirty. Freddy needs to grow a set of balls before he can do the right thing. Sheriff Freddy Heflin....say it quick enough and it sounds like Chief Wiggum!
What is your take on the Sacramento theatre scene?
Besides, it was her persuasiveness that often led me to pray, and selfishly implore…“Please, make Cari take a hike, and relieve me of my suffering.”
So the Borders in the town where I live is going out of business. This makes me incredibly sad, as I like Borders better than B&N, and this Borders has always employed really decent, friendly, bright people, unlike my local B&N.
but this is not sadness
Card Base: A6 4 1/2 x 6 1/4, layers 1/4 less
Deadline: January 15, 2011
Can't you smell that smell
While waiting for opportunity, you may miss the opportunity to create your opportunity and never see it. It’s not exactly how you planned on spending your life, is it?
The Purse
o “Dairy farming requires big financial inputs. Emerging farmers must therefore have access to ready financial support.
I watched as she taught my children, and my sister's children to "sew". She always kept needles and thread at the ready, along with scraps of material, for them to sew when they asked. They would sit for what seemed like hours pushing a needle through fabric, back and forth, until they had created "something". My sister and I had done the same thing as children. She would sit by watching, always ready to help if needed.
I matter in His eyes.
90+8 min: Chelsea are broken now and Newcastle are seeing out this excellent victory.
Controlled Clinical Trial
This week, the LA Senate voted unanimously to kill the plan, followed by the House Judiciary Committee on Thursday.
Knox, Robert 1911 A Historical Relation of Ceylon, ed. by J. Ryan, Glasgow: James Maclehose & Sons.
The Elements Efficiency box is a list of different elements in the game. This is where you will choose how those particular elements affect your character. These boxes use a system of ratings from A to F.
Word. Every day, open your spirit and welcome the Word into your heart. As you
They were operated on to remove their reproductive organs. The girls were allowed to keep their clitorises more or less intact (although not their vaginas) and the boys were plasty’ed to create the same effect, as closely as surgical techniquest could fashion them. (Which was pretty damn close.)
I read a great food-related book a few weeks ago, which I keep meaning to review on here. I will keep you posted.
While they are baking, melt 3 Tbs margarine + 1 /2 tsp garlic powder + a pinch of salt and brush this over the breadsticks when they are done.
Robert Mugabe - President of Zimbabwe, attended 1949–1951,
While we will never know the exact time or place of the return of Christ, what are the followers of Christ to do and not do while they wait?
(General Najiya turns to the cleaners.)
Her theatrical credits include “Bobbie Jo and the Outlaw”, “The Dukes of Hazzard”, “Sky High”, “Super Troopers”, and others.
Black cardigan - Anthro
I do think part of it is because I'm writing YA, too. I want to kind of separate myself from it as I'm working. I spend a lot of time in a dramatic fantasy world with teenagers, and I love it. But I don't want to spend 24 hours a day in the same type of world. So I think I go for kind of the exact opposite, almost as a pallet cleanser.
I think my whole point here(and I did say that it was a ramble) is that for me personally, list-building is often about how much I have in the game, and not necessarily about how many über models I can fit in there. That’s not to say that I don’t use competitive units, but I also won’t handicap myself deliberately by taking sub-par units. It’s different for each person. I don’t take too much time when I make lists – again, limited selection – and I include stuff that I like seeing on the tabletop. A few fun games last year came down to a Devastator with Rage tokens from eButcher trying to pull off a caster kill(didn’t work). It’s stuff like that that I really enjoy.
There were at least 20 reported China UFO sightings in 2010. UFO activity also caused the shut down of airpots in Mongolia (Sep 11) and Hangzhou (July 7). For the complete list of sightings, go here.
I think they liked it--anyway, they certainly all wanted to be put in my next book, with one boy volunteering to be the monster (his peers seemed to agree that he'd be perfect for the part). One down, one to go...but then the dreaded lurgie stepped in and bit me....come back tomorrow to find out whether I survived!
The eviction came as Frazer, 63, who lost her husband and then job in 2009, had been challenging the foreclosure in county and federal courts by seeking to restructure the terms of a delinquent mortgage. However, the latest holder of her loan, Investors One Corporation—the fourth company that bought her mortgage in an eight-month period—allowed the eviction to proceed even thought it was “negotiating” new loan terms with her attorney one day before the police raid.’
In one of the presidential debates in 2000 between Al Gore and George Bush, President Bush said, “The military exists to fight and to win wars. It does not exist to do peacekeeping or nation building.” Yet, after a brilliantly executed invasion of Iraq, the military finds itself in the latter role. As President Bush accurately predicted in 2000, the military did an extraordinarily good job during the invasion phase of the war in Iraq, but we should all agree at this point that the occupation has not gone well. Initially, when Iraqis pulled down statues of Saddam Hussein, and later when they courageously voted in spite of threats to their lives, it appeared that we might be successful in inspiring the first democracy in the Arab world.
Let's get started shall we?
I wanted to share a couple of delicious and very simple recipes for parties or just fun appetizers. The first one is made with black beans and I love black beans!!! Greece doesn't sell black beans (as far as I know) and I have been craving for them for the past year and half - they are my favorite legume by far :)
nights far off as the sea mouth gulping
I know it’s been a while since I’ve given you an update up my master bathroom redo. I promise, I’ve been working as fast as my adorable little pennies and free time allow (Oh why can’t I have one of those HGTV budgets?). I also swear to you that I’m thiiiiis close to showing you the next phase of the project, and, I have to say, it’s pretty darn cool. I’m kind of loving it.
turn away from his countenance.
"Why not?" came Clay's innocent question.
It seems relatively simple, and it is. The results for us were pretty cool, though. What happened before when we would go buy something is that we would just fork over the debit card, write it down and move on. When we have to pay cash for things, I’ve found that we’re more reluctant to part with it! It’s harder to drop $3.00 on a coffee on the go when you realize how much of a dent that will put in your grocery budget for the week. It makes those little impulse buys easier to resist when you have to hand over cold, hard cash to pay for it. Plus, you can look and see at exactly what $25.00 for groceries looks like (which is not much, but it makes you aware of your spending habits).
I love textures and layers yet I don't like my LOs to look "heavy".
Again from my friend Sarah. Here's the link: http://emptybobbinsewing.com/2010/12/12/o-christmas-tree-o-felt-christmas-tree/ Our house is not big enough to accommodate an actual tree (that's just one of our excuses for not having one), yet the kids would really like to do one. They can help with most aspects of this one.
“I am speaking to you from the Cabinet Room at Cowley Street.
Pre-race
I've finally getten to the point where I want to make crafts with the little ones, and build some memories.
Mercy Franklin or as she will later find out is Lilly Hayes is a poor girl who had been lied to for all of her life. She knew nothing of her past only what she was discovering from her adoptive mother’s diary. Mercy soon discovered life on her own was hard but she knew she could get through. She applied for a governess job and found one quickly. Mercy found to love her charge but the Uncle unnerved her.
Robert Zemeckis (Forrest Gump)
I first started getting into wine late in my university career. A year or two after the Iron Curtain came down, Hungarian and Bulgarian Carbernet Sauvignons began appearing in the supermarket for £1.99 a bottle. I mean, who would want to drink East European wine? Well, students for one. Initially buying it because it was even cheaper than Liebfraumilch, after the first bottle we drank little else thanks to its concentration of spiced Ribena blackberries on liquid velvet. These bottles quickly went up to £2.99, then £3.99... by the time we graduated they were £7.99, beyond our reach. And by the time I could afford them again, they just didn't taste the same. Either my palate had improved massively, or the wines had been dumbed down.
EAST ASIA
Each respective author has personally signed their novel and I can’t express how hard it will be to let go of them, but let go I will…to three lucky winners. But wait, that’s just in group A. Group B contains three $15 gift cards. One from Barnes & Noble, another from Amazon, and the final from Borders. Six prizes in all! Good golly Miss Molly!! Oops...sorry Rhys. :)
Narrator (Surprised) Yes, it is a TARDIS… but how did you know?
This could add up to $50 million in expenses to hotel budgets every year, increased costs that would be passed onto hotel visitors.
As you can see, Rosen has an extensive record of fighting for American jobs and small businesses, and she will do the same, and more, on a national level, if elected to Congress. What is Harris’s record? Tax breaks for the wealthy and tax increases on the middle class. Harris is helping wealthy CEOs become richer while you are struggling. Harris is advocating for the same policies that got the country into this financial mess in the first place, but Rosen will be fighting for the policies that will bring us out of it.
My laptop blew up....
The majority of the kids that live in this particular housing area live in single parent homes. Their mothers work and Gail, being home, welcomes them into her home after school so they do not have to go into their apartments alone. She is more than a sitter to these kids. They consider her a dear and trusted friend. I learned that from some of those kids this morning in Sunday School when we were talking about friendship.
When he get’s high,you see what he see’s… Which for pure imagination and graphic’s you have to give this film the thumbs up,a lot of people who enjoy getting high claim it’s one of their favourite movies,as my getting high days are behind me,I couldn’t really relate or enjoy the film.
I was recently told that “just try rings on, see what suits your finger/hand and go with what you like from there”
Well my quest to get organised has gone off track lately. I have been very distracted by what is going on in South East Queensland, Australia. We have had rain, rain and more rain. The weather seems to have cleared briefly but they say there may be more coming!
My mom: "WHAT?"
by December 21, 2010 for my next tutorial!
Like the 19th-century missionaries who attempted to stamp it out, the ruling ANC party disapproves of polygamy, partly because it reinforces white men's stereotypes of Africans as somehow uncivilised.
So the Trayvon Martin case has fewer similarities with Emmit Till or James Byrd Jr, and is becoming more and more about cashing in and pandering for votes.
Now, we knew that Lumpy could clap. Man, that's old news. We just thought he was copying us clapping when he was clapping. We had no idea that he recognised the word clap. But he does. He knows a word.
I figured ice wine and I would always be distanced by a gap that a student’s budget couldn’t bridge. Then I came across an article about the Niagara Icewine Festival which goes from January 14 until January 30. Though a $20 bottle isn't exactly cheap or a small fee for a tasting, this kind of drinking is much more budget friendly than $70.
* Includes Economy Class fares booked in Y, W, B, H, K, M, L, V or S on American Airlines marketed flights; Economy Class fares booked in Y, W, B, E, H, K, M, L, V or S on Japan Airlines operated flights.
Pecan Harvest Ale is a new limited edition brew, just like Abita Strawberry Harvest. Earlier this year consumers quickly cleared the shelves of Strawberry Harvest Lager and called the brewery begging for more of the beer made with real Louisiana strawberries. Twenty-seven thousand, five hundred (27,500) cases of beer sold out in only 12 weeks. “We want to remind our customers that supplies of our new Pecan Harvest Ale are limited too. We won’t brew any more until next year and when it’s gone…it’s a gone pecan,” said Blossman. So crack one open for yourself today!
Friday, June 8
Then Eli and I went off to walk a nature trail and I just keep thinking and saying out loud "We get to live here - this place is so beautiful". Like when you go on vacation to somewhere beautiful and then I remember, we live here. We are so blessed.
‘We're asking someone from the lacrosse team to step forward,’ Durham police Cpl. David Addison said. ‘We will be relentless in finding out who committed this crime.’”
Keep on, 2010.
The Darent Valley Path doglegs to take a southerly course east of the river, but I leave it to continue directly south, alongside grassy meadows beneath a darkening and drizzly sky. In the near distance, over the railway, the hills of the North Downs fade into misty grey. Onto a farm track, further along which the map shows a ‘Monument’ – a typically nondescript, anonymous Ordnance Survey description – which might be worth investigating. I’m expecting a war memorial, perhaps in the form of a stone column, but nothing typically monument-like appears. To my right however, in the corner of the playing field on the edge of Otford, a number of white obelisks, similar to trig points, are scattered across the turf – can this be it? I hop over a stile for a closer look and an interpretation board explains all: this is the Otford Solar System, a 1:4595000000 scale model of our planetary system.
How is it possible that my sweet little baby boy is one? Wasn't he just born? Didn't I just labor for hours upon hours upon hours? I remember the day perfectly. Check it out if you want to share in the memory of Jonah's birth (link).
Call this reality? Call this realistic? On the piss with A S Byatt, in a place that doesn’t allow mobile phones. A writer born in London, back in London, with an Irish mobile phone stuffed down my left sock and a German mobile phone stuck down my right sock, both phones vibrating with congratulations from England and Ireland and America and Berlin. Vibrating with love from around the one world.
He questions why is there an idea that men must go in one direction of the store and woman must go in the other? There are no rules in fashion, so why are there these society rules?
Will: Government didn’t create any jobs until
Josh, the Marlborough born Kiwi from Moa took a flight up to Sydney from Melbourne to be our special guest in Darlo and it turned out to be a memorable night with a lot of new faces and a great Q & Ale session.
Ryan believes his federal budget plan helps accomplish that goal. In a letter last year to then-Archbishop (now Cardinal) Timothy Dolan of New York, Ryan stated that his proposed budget better targets assistance to those in need, repairs the social safety net, and fulfills the mission of health and retirement security for all Americans. Furthermore, if the U.S. government continues to drive up the deficit through reckless spending, Ryan wrote that “the weakest will be hit three times over: by rising costs, by drastic cuts to programs they rely on, and by the collapse of individual support for charities that help the hungry, the homeless, the sick, refugees and others in need.”
18. Miike Snow... This Swedish/ American band came out of nowhere to produce a handful of memorable, if slightly conventional, songs. Their videos were equally memorable.
Me: “Yea sweetie?
I don't remember feeling sad,
For this project I used today's debuting die templates but in a slightly different way. Although I used the same Edgeabilities Pointed Edge decorative insert, I paired it up with a different edge called Classic Triple Scallop Edge from Edgeabilities Classic Edges Two die templates to cut the blue border from Graphic 45 paper.
The band gained even more notoriety when an article was written in Penthouse Magazine about the fiasco. So they went out to LA to take advantage of the situation and got to open for the Go-Go's at the Whisky. Continuous west coast touring prevailed as a second single, "Right To Know," became a hit on KROQ as well. By this time Stuart had left the band and was first replaced by keyboardist Glover Gill, followed by Will Fiveash on guitar.
This last one is a concern that plagues me in most situations. I know I'm not stupid, but I'm acutely aware that I'm really not very articulate, verbally anyway. And I think that I can easily come across as a bit thick because of my lack of repartee.
The things you never did
TVNewsCheck, April 27, 2012 11:45 AM EDT
5. In the Cool, Cool, Cool of the Evening
expresses the force of desire, apparently.
Pleased to meat you: A huge red building, wooden benches..a glutonous carvery of charred and grilled animal meats, eat as much as you like for a fixed price.
Does it stink like rotten meat?
This book is fabulous!
No. I. Didn't.
1 dimorphic
When I lived in New York City, between the Jones Beach murder and the riots in Crown Heights in Brooklyn— the neighborhood I lived in— I knew that racism was something the north needed to work on as well. I’ve heard racial slurs come out of the mouths of New Yorkers that I never heard come out of my racist grandmother in Georgia. And it continues. Last November, in White Plains, N.Y., 68-year-old African American and former Marine Kenneth Chamberlain was Tasered and shot to death in his own home by police when his medical alert pendant went off. It was a false alarm and the pendant recorded the entire event, including Chamberlain pleading for his life with police.
Todd Sattersten offers the following observations: "Amazon launched Kindle Singles last week. These original works of 10,000 to 30,000 words are designed to fill the space between an essay and book. At the same time, TED, the popular conference organization, launched TED Books as a publishing imprint using the Singles program. Director Chris Anderson stated what he sees as the problem: “Busy people can be daunted at the prospect of having to read a 300- or 400-page book.” Amazon VP Russ Grandinetti suggesting a more elegant reason for this experimental evolution: “Our goal with Singles is to allow compelling ideas to be expressed at their natural length.”
I am the third and youngest of three brothers ands sisters born to Inocencio Ojeda and Gloria Rios, all natives of Naguabo, Puerto Rico. My father was a teacher in the public instruction system. My mother administered what was then the rural Post Office which consisted of a room in the house where I was born in Rio Blanco, a small community about five miles from the town of Naguabo.
Michel: If we agree with you about restricting implicit redefinitions, what about our prior
The year 2006 marks the centenary celebrations of the first African Pentecostal Church in Britain. This Church now known as Sureway International Christian Ministries was founded by the late Rev Thomas Kwame Brem-Wilson around 1906. The year 1906 is very significant in Pentecostal history as it was the year that the Pentecostal revival of Azusa Street in Los Angeles started. Some scholars and commentators will even see this event as the beginning of the Pentecostal Movement, while others will argue that it was 1900/1901 at Topeka Kansas that modern Pentecostalism originated. Another debate associated with the history of Pentecostalism is whether Charles Parham (1873-1929) or William J Seymour (1870-1922) is the founder of the movement. Those who prefer Parham do so on the basis that he formulated the Pentecostal theology of speaking in tongues as the initial evidence of the Baptism of the Holy Spirit, while those who prefer Seymour on the understanding that the Pentecostal missionary movement and ecumenical vision which transcends racism started with Seymour’s movement in 1906. Whichever is our take on it, one thing is clear and that is that the origins of Pentecostalism in Britain is very much linked to the event in Azusa Street.
So now we are snuggled in the house. Feeling a bit sleepy from our romp...ready to snuggle down and sleep deeply.
But usually the answer comes from a natural character; a gaggle of geese doing a low pass enroute the grassland next door, Paul and Christina's sheep baa-ing in the distance, an actual pacific chorus frog sitting on a dock leaf (and a garter snake sliding through the tall grass toward him) or a bank of low cloud hanging over the valley to the west. Priceless gifts that cost nothing but our time.
Lastly, do NOT get a full Flash web site. Flash is becoming obsolete because smart phones don't support Flash. The only time I create anything for Flash now-a-days at my day job is for banner ads and the face of online advertising is changing as I write. Who knows where Flash will be used in the next fiscal year? Based on my own web site's statistics, many people are looking at my site on smart phones (probably hiding from their wives or work people) so it is absolutely essential for your site to be smart phone-friendly. If anyone tries to convince you to get a Flash site cause it moves and makes noises, just say NO.
The fundamental issue isn't Forest City Ratner. Any developer would press its advantage, with varying degrees of sincerity, dexterity, and deviousness.
I love buffalo chicken dip… and yes, one bite will not kill me… but it’s one bite that kicks open the door to temptation and then before I know it, I’m 25 chips in and have eaten the whole container.
I used a couple of website here and here and read a bit of information, then as usual, I just used the things I and on hand, ignored the bits I didn't, then proceeded to do it my own way and see how it turned out.
New York has always been my dream. For as long as I have known that it is possible to get on a plane and go there, it's been my dream.
It is our considered opinion, and we so hold, that Commonwealth Act No. 671 became inoperative when Congress met in regular session on May 25, 1946, and that Executive Orders Nos. 62, 192, 225 and 226 were issued without authority of law. In setting the session of Congress instead of the first special session preceded it as the point of expiration of the Act, we think giving effect to the purpose and intention of the National Assembly. In a special session, the Congress may “consider general legislation or only such as he (President) may designate.” (Section 9, Article VI of the Constitution.) In a regular session, the power Congress to legislate is not circumscribed except by the limitations imposed by the organic law.
All this aside, the most lasting impression that I got from the overall experience I feel is the most important one that we can learn from in the UK — and that’s the positive attitude. Glenn uses the word collegiate and I can’t think of a better term with which to describe the brewing community out there; people work together so closely, they care about what happens to their neighbouring brewery and they refuse to give in to any doom and gloom.
The total bill, plus 2 green tea drinks came to 41.70 rgt. for the two of us. This place will be full come the 1st and 15th day of each month where people of the Buddhist and Taoist faith observe a vegetarian diet.
-alhamdulillah, there's funny things that Allah has fated today, so i dont really feel very stressed.
We choose from only the most remote and inhospitable places that planet Earth has to offer and leave your child for seven days of brutal survival! Your child will learn to fend for themselves learning to make shelter, build a fire, and find out what plants are edible, in the realist reality show ever!
Then...I had a baby...and didn't get a chance to do the giveaway.
Written on September 18, 2011
If there was a band that I should have found space for in my Top Ten, but didn’t, it was GNR. Other songs suggested in the comments included “Welcome To The Jungle” and and “Paradise City. Both brilliant, but I settled on “Sweet Child O’ Mine”. The solos soar and the rhythm rocks. It is perfect heavy rock’n'roll.
And of yourself become a forgetter.
F is for that little wretch - I mean the flying fox;
Last week-end, a small art fair took place for the first time in the quarter Saint-Louis. It was organized by the local business association. Some 10 artists took part, mostly painters and sculptors.
I take a deep breath then exhale it heavily.
Erm, yes Griffin……
Green: Flower Stem
If you're still in doubt as to whether this event is becoming a reality, check out the Countdown Clock on the official website.
They finish by discussing what possible wedding presents their families will send them. Then they go back to writing - Jane to writing her novel, William to writing his book, which started as a polemical autobiography called Under the Mushroom Cloud but is now a political analysis of American Life, perhaps to be titled Love and Violence: The American Antimonies. Writing is something William has found he enjoys.
Odious little man (Steve from Accounts) rang again from VISION PUBLICATION GROUP (see last post) and asked me again for the money I so called 'owed'. I had, in the time since our last dear little phone call, contacted Trading Standards, and a very kind solicitor from the Federation of Small Businesses. Between the two of these phone calls, I managed to get a letter together to send to Vision. This letter was unsent but ready to go, when Steve (see above) called.
The Worts scurry around fussing over their slaves,
Do you have aspirations to get out and travel more? I know it’s a dream of many.
Then, once I was looking again, nothing. Except for a three-day gig I turned down because I was so convinced I'd have lots of better offers any minute. I spent the last day of holiday marching my family around the clifftops of Devon trying to get a signal and still nothing.
Add the broccoli and 1/4 cup water. Cover with a pot lid (it steams the broccoli!). Let it steam for about 5 minutes or until the majority of the water has steamed out.
It’s Sunday, right? I forgot. Haha, wow, that’s just sad. My brain has disappeared.
Here is just one of the many plaid shirts I find at GW for my husband and son!
A few years after receiving my generic bachelor's, I returned to school to obtain a certification to teach English as a Second Language. I slugged my way through some hard-core linguistics classes, still believing Shakespeare would be harder, and eventually got a job teaching at a public middle school. A few years later, I transferred to the high school level, delighted to be assigned the upper-level ESL kids (i.e., those almost ready to "graduate" from the program into mainstream classes). But there was a catch: In order for the students to receive English, not merely elective, credit for the classes, the teacher had to be certified in Grades 6-12 English Language Arts in addition to ESL.
What age were you aware of feeling different?
sustenance such that it will
and when her memories come to her, I know
In that place, Ganga is called Gautami (Gautama’s daughter) and Siva is called Tryambakeswar. It is one of the Jyotirlingas of Siva. Look here for map and photos.
Shut the place down.
and archaeological evidence of the civilization-Daroo Monhenjo, Easter Island and the Pyramid of Egypt and South America.
Now you can decide what color felt or fabric print you want to use for each piece. Iron the freezer paper pattern onto your choice of material, I chose to make my fridge out of blue felt.
Pink lids are in stores now and can be turned in up to December 31. Get out there, eat some yogurt and save the lids!
And there's the ocean - I'll be staring at it, walking in it, breathing it in for four whole days.
Fred Vermorel also waxed lyrical about Bush's NICENESS, but
‘She broke off the pointed tip. He was surprised to see how easily it broke. Before his eyes, she put the tip in her mouth and ate it. “Try some…”
We celebrated at dinner with one of Cecilia’s favorites, steamed mussels, and glasses of wine. I prepared the mussels with an Italian sauce and served over bowls of linguine. The meal was completed with chopped green salad with balsamic vinaigrette and hot French rolls. For dessert, we had Key Lime Pie from Publix’s. A nice ending to a special day. We were so happy to have Cecilia for a visit.
In a small bowl combine the saffron threads, ginger and salt.
For my children, so each knows that loving work is possible and that it’s an amazing feeling when you do: in my opinion, a necessary feeling. I don’t want my children ever believing work is anything less than an adventure. Dear girls, aspire to love your work as you would a dear pet, even a brother or sister. All can (and likely will) break your heart. But that’s work and that’s life.
As the revolution in Libya and across the Middle East heats up by the hour, it's worth standing back and making some cool observations. Contrary to what Gil Scott Heron said once (see the Featured Artist page) the revolution is being televised. It's also being reported round the clock by the internet, Twitter and mobile phone. I can honestly say that I have seen more images of Libya in the past few weeks than I have in the 40 years of Gaddafi being in power. Unlike previous revolutions( the American, French, Russian, Iranian, Velvet, etc), modern technology gives us a ring side seat to the making of history.
So between 1929 and 1934 a railway line was built above ground level and operated until the 1980s. In 1999 it was threatened with demolition, but Friends of the High Line, led by Joshua David and Robert Hammond, campaigned to have it retained.
as well as many of the other Simply Sassy stamps..
Over the last three days, there has been more than enough reportage of events in and around Dominique Strauss-Kahn’s malign treatment in New York, and the minute dissection of what happened from one minute to the next – from a sexual encounter with Nafissatou Diallo, all the way through to his return to France with rape charges against him dropped. In this piece, The Slog focuses on what may have been ‘mistaken identity’ in relation to the entire operation against DSK.
This card I started for the challenge before this current one at TSOT. So this is just a share today. Some days just seem to fly by & before I know it the week has been & gone. I was kinda hoping that the year would start out a little slower that it has. Oh well that's life.
This is not to suggest that werewolves, at least according to Duncan’s vision, are pack animals; they’re not. He has met others over the years but just in passing. It’s the vampires that are the social ones. This is how vampires view werewolves:
To be honest, I expect that every married couple has their own List. And I expect, by comparison, their Lists make mine look quite lenient.
The Mob and Me: Wiseguys and the Witness Protection Program by former U.S. Marshal, John Partington with former Rhode Island attorney general, Arlene Violet, ($26.00, Gallery Books) takes the reader behind the scenes with one of the founders of the Witness Protection Program and a personal protector to more than five hundred informants. The program is one of the most successful in law enforcement. Back in 1967, at the request of Senator Bobby Kennedy, Partington was asked to create a program to get bad guys to testify against worse guys. They were offered lifelong protection in exchange for the conviction of the upper echelons of organized crime, including a permanent identity change for every member of the witness’s family. In this way, the Mafia code of “emerta” was broken. Protection would also be provided to other high-profile witnesses. It makes for some very interesting reading. Over the years we have seen how attorneys have become skilled at trying their cases in the court of public opinion as well as in the halls of justice. Kendall Coffey has written about this trend in Spinning the Law ($26.00, Prometheus Books), pulling back the curtain to reveal how and why it’s done. Coffey has been a frequent legal commentator for CNN, MSNBC, and Fox News. He discusses the behind-the-scenes media strategies in major courtroom battles to include publicity, press conferences, television interviews, and carefully orchestrated Internet exposure. All, says the author, have become an integral part of the legal art of convincing jurors, judges, and members of the public regarding the defendant’s innocence or guilt. Need I remind anyone of a certain former Illinois Governor who beat every rap except one in a recent highly publicized case? With a foreword by Alan M. Dershowitz, this will make for “must” reading by a legion of lawyers and anyone interested in the judicial process.
So we lay down together again--
The owner of the software can then send messages to the phone in question, telling it to carry out a range of tasks such as taking a picture with the camera, sending emails, or even calling specific phone numbers. The criminal can also get all the information it has collected on the infected phone, instruct it to be put into a zip file and uploaded to an online account.
and lives for laughter,
When I actually got into Monorail I realised that it was going to be a far costlier day than I had budgeted for, as I saw the Fame singles box set and decided that it had to be purchased. So when I got to the front of the queue this was the second thing asked for after Sweet Jane and I was also successful with the Raveonettes and Fall, as you will be aware, I also forked out for a copy of the MC5/Africa Bambaataa 7" of Kick out the Jams and the Big Deal vs S.C.U.M. single which is excellent.
Quick update from Kristin:
A tumbleweed rolls by a stark western street. A buzzard caws and flaps away. A rock tumbles down a stony plateau. Suddenly, in the distance, the thunderous patter of horse hooves on the tough desert floor. A miniature carriage erupts passed a rickety wooden gate. It is pulled by Shetland ponies. The diminutive driver whips the dwarf steeds to a fine halt and the little people inside disembark. It’s a wild west inhabited entirely by little people! So what do The Wizard of Oz and classic cowboy melodramas have in common? Well, if you’re referring to The Terror of Tiny Town they share a lot of the same cast (the Munchkins anyway).
The 4 of us combined finished high enough to bring home the team prize so that’s 2 weeks on the trot for the Bowland Babes, can we make it the triple with Coledale on Saturday?
It's very sad to hear them fighting, and sometimes concerning. We keep an ear out to be sure that there is no domestic violence going on -- if it seemed too serious, we'd call authorities to check in on things. As it is, it just sounds like a couple that ought not stay together.
Damn,it’s so hard to describe “Ruby Blue”.This book it’s just PERFECT!This is the single word that matches perfect with the book:Perfect!(Gosh,there are so many “perfect” in these sentences.Lol J )
DM7 D7 G A5
In the end it truly was an “ENTERTAINING. THOUGHT-PROVOKING. AWE-INSPIRING.” evening.
Allow the soup mixture to cool slightly, then puree it with an immersion blender. Bring the soup back to the boil and season with some salt and pepper. Serve with a dollop of sour cream, some croutons, and a grilled cheese sandwich (if you're the dipping kind of gal like me!)
I’m not a big fan of Nirvana’s debut album, but School is one song that I absolutely love. So who better to give it a balls-to-the-wall metal cover than Fear Factory? Warning: may cause eardrums to burst through use of double pedal.
Nowhere specifically are costs linked to packages, and, yet, Four O’Clock Press do offer a menu of al-la-carte service prices, but it is unclear as to whether these refer to the services on offer at Four O’Clock Press. Again, this does not help with transparency.
J.A. Beard likes to describe himself as a restless soul married to an equally restless soul. His two children are too young yet to discuss whether or not they are restless souls, but he’s betting on it. He likes to call himself the Pie Master, yet is too cowardly to prove his skills in an actual baking competition. So, really, he’s merely a Potential Pie Master.
Depending on the coverage within the claims of the patents, the licensor may wish to impose limitations beyond the geographical territory on the quantity or volume of products sold and on field-of-use. Field-of-use restrictions are sometimes applied to licences of technologies that have many or several uses. In that event, the licensee may be given the right to practise the technology for one or more, but not all, of the applications. It may be noted that under the United States antitrust laws, field-of-use restrictions and territorial restrictions may have antitrust consequences if their effect is to unreasonably restrain competition among otherwise competing parties (see module 10, on the legal environment in developed countries. The licensee and the licensor as well should assess the effect of such restrictions on both the market and its growth potentials.
Appetisers, Salads & Snacks
from a sea so majestically and malefic at once,
We are all unique right down to our freckles and, please believe me when I tell you, it is our JOB TO SHARE OUR GIFTS WITH THE WORLD. This is something I am so passionate about (note the caps) because it is my sincere belief that your gifts are what the universe is holding it's breath for; waiting for; praying for!
When I won UK Beer Writer of the Year in 2009, it was a particular honour because it was the first year when the award was named after Jackson. And it was even more of an honour some months later when, as the winner of that award, I was invited to guest-edit this collection of pieces about Michael and his immense contribution to beer appreciation and beer writing.
Harvi never even remotely imagined his challenges would be anything of this sort. He had never killed a mouse and he was now supposed to kill a lion. Before that he had to figure where this lion could be found. He turned to the alien to ask him. The alien had disappeared. He was now on his own.
For a deaf child whose first language is A.S.L., English — that is, written English — must be learned as a foreign language, just as a hearing person might study Sanskrit. But there is a catch: ”The letters of the alphabet are based on sounds they can’t hear,” Ms. Sutton explained. For this reason, many deaf students never become fully literate in English, a perennial concern of educators. According to a long-term study by the Gallaudet Research Institute in Washington, deaf high school seniors score, on average, just below the fourth-grade level on standardized reading tests.
Day 9: The Long Drive Home
That’s how socialists view the people who pay them: as incompetent fools in need of micromanagement, so that you everyone will be equal – equally dependent on the government and indistinguishable. While you were completing your double major in economics and physics, they were majoring in feminist theory, race theory and queery theory – learning how their attitudes were better than yours. You learned how to be self-sufficient. They learned how to think that you are stupid and evil.
We also talked about “Priming Your Pump,” or increasing your focus. I covered a few key points based in what we understand about the way the brain works. Listen to the recording for the nuances and details. In the meantime, here are three quick tips to help increase your focus right away.
-is intelligent
Hey! It takes courage to get through the door. Linette helps me with that. I look forward to dancing with you, Remon, and practicing the steps we've learned.
I swear I saw stars. I was shocked. Not that the insurance did not send in their paperwork yet. But they had us sit there for almost 3 hrs KNOWING we were checked in and done filling in our paperwork. Why did they not come and tell us. She said "it is a new staff and we are still learning".
professional thought, besides billing, “Law” has nothing to do with
When I participate in groupreads that last more than a couple weeks, I like to include fan art in my posts when I can. There’s some really cool Mistborn fan art floating around the internet. The picture to the left is “Mistborn Vin” by twilightbeta.
Then they add the "aged moss" finish and voila..you have an absolutely gorgeous accent for the home or garden. Though the pieces I feature on my online store are the smaller accent pieces, they have a very extensive line and I am able to get much much bigger planters, ornaments of all kinds, statues,etc....so just inquire if you are interested. Anyway here's a look at the line........and a pretty giveaway (details at bottom of post)
Smiths The boy with the thorn in his side UK
*When my son was in middle school the teachers would at the end of class check each and every student’s agenda book to see if they had written correctly their assignment(s). The teacher would initial it (or use a stamp) to confirm that it was correct. I thought this was a fantastic idea and it also made sure that the students had their assignments written down correctly and they would know when to turn them in on time. Parents also had to sign the agenda book daily to verify that they had read the above and understood what their child was supposed to do.
Spray a 9 X 13 baking pan with cooking spray. Mix all ingredients except ¾ cup of the cheese together in the baking dish and smooth out to cover the entire dish. Put remaining cheese on top and bake at 350 degrees for 30 minutes or until cheese is melted and bubbly.
OK am now off back out as the team are now off somewhere else leafleting for a few hours for the up coming Croxteth By Election. A few hours down there while the weather is in our favour
another song on the juke box played for a dime,
Given how truly ill I was feeling at this point, I thought I should have some fruit: fruta asada de temporada con su subayon, or roasted seasonal fruit of pineapple, peach, and strawberries in subayon. Again, the fruit was a little too cold, but the “subayon” turned out to be a frothy, almost foamy (Spanish foam again!) tart sauce that must have had some milk or cream in it, because caramelizing the top had created a little skin. I wanted to die and I was drunk.
Of course, one must try the authentic paellas here in España. We tried some when we sat and dined in Plaza Mayor, while watching the crowds in chilly weather. But the best was introduced to us by our foodie friends who brought us to this hole in the wall somewhere in Tres Peces, 20 near the Anton Martin metro station. It is called Ventorillo Murciano.
So take a piece
1 cup brown sugar
Black Market Brewer's Brunch
That has been the constant situation for decades and Cubans (as well
As I said, it's a simple recipe (and I used a single-infusion mash, too). The Scottish Ale yeast attenuates well, and brings out some malty notes with few estery issues.
I'm so excited -- yesterday in my e-mail, I found a message from a small American publishing house inquiring about turning my blog into a book. It's too early to tell whether this will really happen, just how many hoops there are to jump through, but nonetheless, I've been walking around ten feet above the ground.
A few weeks ago I ranted about a very embarassing experience. While discussing it in the comments section I hinted that there was even worse to come and it is after great deliberation that I have decided to post about another Very Embarassing Experience, purely for your amusement.
Elif Shafak begins her new novel with a dedication containing a dark and portentous anecdote: when she was seven years old, she lived next door to a tailor who was in the habit of beating his wife. “In the evenings, we listened to the shouts, the cries, the swearing. In the morning, we went on with our lives as usual. The entire neighbourhood pretended not to have heard, not to have seen.”
The only difficult thing about the books was the high number of deaths and tragedies. And it doesn't end when they finally arrive in Oregon. One of the deaths at the end of Book 2 (of Joshua's grandfather) really took the wind out of our sails, and at that point Kieran did not want me to read any more! A few days later, though, he wanted me to finish.
The study reveals: 1) a model of how consumers relate to celebrities, and therefore how celebrity brands can be shaped; 2) the key payoffs that consumers derived from the three celebrities studied (Shah Rukh Khan, Hrithik Roshan and Akshay Kumar); and 3) kinds of fan relationships.
It felt like another weight being lifted off my shoulders. I talked in depth with Lee about it. It was another piece of my personal puzzle of letting go, releasing, and moving on. I didn’t even know it had been there but it came up at the right time.
In among a series of essays about climate change, economic meltdown, the role of the artist in society and the flaws of monogomous relationships, Daniel Pinchbeck also turns his attention to alien contact, crop circles and breaking through into his unconsciousness with the use of psychedelic drugs.
If that is the case, then I would think that BLISS would be completely unattainable here on earth.
Check back in a few months to see how it's going. Assembling the boxes will be one thing, constructing all the practical props will be another...
the holy man replies,
The next time Girl Crazy came to the screen, it would have the color (Metro-, not Techni-) that this version lacked, but that's about all. Still, considering the chaotic and uncertain atmosphere abroad in Hollywood at the time, it's remarkable that the third outing didn't turn out even worse than it did.
Josie
The new show I am referencing is New Girl starring Zooey Deschanel. The situation comedy is broadcast on Tuesday evenings on Fox at 9:00 p.m. Each of the primary characters is very likeable, but it is Zooey Deschanel (Jess in the show) who absolutely lights up the television screen with her charm and wit.
I have to use a plate holder to display the frame because I painted it upside down and the hole for the stick that keeps the frame standing is on the top instead of the bottom. Do you ever make silly mistakes? I do more times than I care to count.
Luckily there is no such thing as too many lamps..
Christina wiped her legs as she explained to the guests how Etta James was the one singer she aspired to be like. Afterward, Christina delivered a heartfelt vocal tribute to Etta as she belted the Etta’s signature tune “At Last” that was by far one of the best deliveries of the iconic song I’ve ever heard. Unfortunately, mother nature paid Christina a visit at one of the wost times ever! On stage, in front of everyone, in a skirt.
Negative words include:
Question: Anyone else but me have issues with some of these K-drama kisses? No one wants to insult the actors involved, but I've seen many, many different K-dramas where big romantic moments became really cold and awkward like this.
Something is working when there’s such hunger for history amongst the young ‘uns.
Hey guess what? It’s May 1, so that means there should probably be a goals recap from last month. Last month in the post Here a Goal, There a Goal I set out to accomplish 3 things:
The man was interviewed and stated that it was a "little humiliating" but he was gonna do whatever it took. Why should he be humiliated? Here is the picture of a person who really wants to work and is taking the responsibility and initiative to to get a job.
Former presenter BBC tv’s ‘Blue Peter’, now Producing own programmes for the BBC
Once we’re up and running, having learnt from your bitter experience, we would steer clear of the chardonnay socialists and multiculturalist weirdos at the AFL, A-League and Super15s, and go straight to the NRL for jumper sponsorship negotiations. As long as they didn’t consider it an infringement on their intellectual property, they would bloody love it.
They say we're the city of eight million people with eight million different stories. Here in Brooklyn we have 2.5 million of those denizens. I'm one of them. I have an account of two other Brooklynites I'd like to share. I have a story for you about one day, one place and two people who demonstrate and epitomize, first - Like I've been telling you, the spirit, soul, the essence of the Brooklyn Dodgers is alive, well, and thriving here in the Borough of Kings. But secondly, and most importantly, this is about familial ties and heirlooms, neighborhood loyalties and quite honestly ladies and gentlemen, what being from Brooklyn is really all about.
Such interest as exists in the the US about Greece’s inevitable demise is still extremely limited. It stops beyond Wall Street, Greek-origin immigrants, and Ivy League colleges studying modern history. Even fewer folks would be interested in a debate about European culture and how the EU sits in all of it; but that’s what the show almost went on to discuss next. This will become clearer, stay with me.
I know it's still November and until today I thought it was still a bit early to start thinking about Christmas but it's December in 10 days!
Voice Call: a whistled hew-li and a dry talk. Song: a series of musical technology, lovely whistles; quite diverse.
Politic how you like, but it’s a brute fact that 1.) Wealth is incredibly unequally distributed in America, leading to a rich nation with many poor citizens.
It was the first day of my photography course yesterday, and on each of the five sessions we’re going out and about taking images in different environments. The first evening was set up on Highdown Hill in Worthing, and the task was to photograph some ‘big views’ (the land- and sea-scapes are staggering from up there) as well as a sunset. We were lucky in the second respect, as the grey, drab weather of earlier in the day had cleared and, by the evening the skies were clear and the sun was shining down almost warmly.
Ephesians 5: 25 Husbands, love your wives, just as Christ loved the church and gave himself up for her 28 In this same way, husbands ought to love their wives as their own bodies. He who loves his wife loves himself. 33 However, each one of you also must love his wife as he loves himself, and the wife must respect her husband.
The food and wine looked nice but we weren't here for more than a quick pint, and besides, the air was full of the peircing shrieks of mewling kids so I wouldn't have been able to relax had we stayed. Not a bad pub overall though, for a branded brewery chain house.
There was a time when you would grow up, live, marry, age and die in the same general area your father, grand-father and great grandfather lived out their lives before you. You would walk the same streets, drive the same roads, hunt in the same woods, shop in the same stores, etc that your kin who came before you did.
-Link back to the blogger who presented the award to you.
I've never really helped take care of anyone before, so I'm a newb that needs a little in the way of experience. I have cooked some meals, which in itself is a miracle because I'm usually a tv dinner kind of guy. Home made meals taste way better(except for my mashed potatoes, which ended up a potato flavored goop).
It's deeply ingrained, this schooling paradigm. When even those who were damaged by school will take up its banner, it's not hard to understand how the system is able to perpetuate itself in spite of its well-documented shortcomings. It's a kind of Stockholm Syndrome, where the captives come to identify with their captors. Or domestic abuse, where the victim defends the abuser. Or maybe it's more like that old Ferengi line, "We don't want to end the exploitation, we want to become the exploiters."
Wendy Pettifer, Senior Supervising Solicitor at Hackney Community Law Centre said: “We are relieved that our client, Ms Parma, will no longer have to leave her care home today. However, given Ms Parma’s severe medical problems we will be monitoring her housing situation closely.”
Helping you feel
I bend over and smell the carpet. Nope - nothing.
The land her freedom shall regain,
Now...on to her gifts.
Tonight we got a call for an injured person out cold in a bus terminal. We get there and the buddy is passed out after one too many Listerine bottles. We get him to come around and ambulance comes by for good measure. Turns out he's not fit for cells and needs to get transported to the hospital for clearance. Alls good. Then I get a call saying the hospital refuses to accept the man because he has no ID, at all. Uh ... he's homeless, he never has ID, he comes to the hospital and cells so much he's got his own coffee mug. Poor paramedics are stuck with this drunk that they can't drop off and they really can't keep him either. It's one thing to bring a puppy home but ... something about drunk 50 year old men just doesn't fly. Officer GM who had worked the call has to go all the hospital, go with the charge nurse and paramedics and go, yup that's drunk jimmy. Patient went in, paramedics went on their way, cops went on their way. 10 mins later, paramedics are calling back. Hospital is refusing to keep him. He's too rude. Take him away. *head desk* We can't put him in cells until he's medically cleared, and they don't want to clear him because he's dropped too many f bombs. Cops were heading back as I was heading out the door.
Luckily for us, we ‘re living in an era where even dogs have a smartphone and all that time we both kept in touch, monitoring each other’s step until I proudly sent:
Now let's see the creations in ALL their GLORY!
Well, I suppose…I’m definitely not getting to sleep any faster by just sitting her typing. I will talk to you again soon, Carter. I love you. Sweet dreams.
It's the thought that counts, right?
Here are the holdings. Lots of energy, financials, with some consumer discretionary stocks. The ETF must weight according to the TSX 60 so you are invested significantly in three maybe four market sectors.
On a separate venture, Tea with Mary Kate was lucky enough to experience a spot of tea tasting with the generous time and tea knowledge of James Pogson, of Northern Tea Merchants.
Or maybe you have all my books already. And maybe your friends do, too. So okay then, what about giving the gift of a Spike Writing Workshop? That can be arranged. Just let me know and I'll print up a nice gift certificate and mail that along. So here's info on the books and the workshops.
Quite true. But the precise wording of the Institution by our Lord of Holy Communion in the New Testament is very significant in this regard. The Greek word commonly translated as “remembrance” is anamnesis. It is used four times only in the Greek translation of the Old Testament, the Septuagint, which is the version constantly used by the New Testament writers. In two of those four occasions it has a manifestly sacrificial context. (The other two occurences, in the titles of Psalms 38 &70, are uncertain as to meaning, but evidence from the Targums – Aramaic translations of the Hebrew Scriptures – indicates they refer to memorial sacrifices as well.) Allow me to quote from another writer (source:
I recently came across this delicious recipe and it reminded me of a favorite bar cookie mom use to make. Mouth-watering! I am not sure though that these would freeze very well. They have a light colored layer on top of a dark base.
- Clarke's First Law -
It's not always that she has made poor decisions. Yes, there are times when she might say yes too many times.
Love Story – Taylor Swift
4 pork chops , ½ inch thick
I have my sights set on your womb
2; example
Claim 86 states:
I did a follow up post on how to apply products to curly hair that you can see here. If you have any questions about curly hair or any hair for that matter, just message me to my email or leave a comment below!!
Christopher Hitchens . . . God called him to Judgment last year.
V/A - Fresh Sounds From Middle America #3 (Fresh sounds 1986 Comp with Psychic Archie, Vow Bulows, Homestead Grats...)
100 of your choice (goblet squat, push ups or swings)
2. Coulson may have been protected by Downing Street leaning on Andy Hayman.
“valuable and incisive book…makes challenging proposals for a new balance of responsibility and partnership in world affairs. These are indeed critical issues which will determine the future of humanity in the twenty-first century.” by Martin Lees, Secretary General, Club of Rome
Integrated and balanced palate with a clean elegant mouthfeel.
Jesus submits to torture and crucifixion. Films like The Passion of the Christ give us some idea of the agony he went through. But we can never really grasp the horror of his mental and physical anguish.
She came up, looking down the hall, watching what she could of Haywire as he made his way to his room.
04. You're The Only One - Song For Elizabeth Taylor
But for many, Facts' most memorable moments came in simple day-to-day realities, from a child's certainty of its mother's love to the comforting knowledge that a favorite television show would start promptly at 8 p.m.
Scarf - Salvation Army, 99 cents
When budgeting, be sure to allot a bit of cash for pocket money. It’s important to have a little spending money for unexpected, spur of the moment purchases. Use your allowance to buy yourself whatever you want, and don’t spend any more that that. This way, you can have small treats without causing big damage.
Rule Five: Learn the market. Period. Don’t depend on someone else to do it for you. You’ll thank me in the end.
'It couldn't have been Emily. Emily was dead so she wouldn't be watching her own burial. It must have been Charlotte, telling you how upset she was.'
We stop a few times. Each time she gets out of the car and leaves me in it, she tosses me a treat, says, “I’ll be right back,” and returns in a few minutes. Then we go to that big building we went to on the first day – the one that had all the smells and other animals. She leads me to the back of the building.
So I payed for the ￥315 and bought the crap then after I finished the prologue and chapter 1 *drum rolls*
His gaze searched the surrounding area for tracks but found nothing. It was as if she’d just disappeared. By Odin’s wrath that was impossible, he had been right behind her. She couldn’t have vanished.
Running over the same old ground,
…and 3 more Q65 singles.
Identification Mature male: deep iridescent pink title, back, rump, and side coverts; greatly forked longest tail with large bright spots; rich strong to rufous temple and underparts; iridescent pink areas on sides of chest, sometimes with very narrow connection in center. Wings and longest tail black. Mature female: just like using its but with paler underparts and less greatly forked longest tail. Immature: duller above than adults, with reduced but still greatly forked longest tail, buffy guitar neck and temple, white underparts. Flight: very sharp wings, greatly forked longest tail, and low zigzagging trip are distinctive. Hybrids: seldom reported. High cliff and give ingests in Southern The u. s. declares, and typical house-martin in Old Community.
Gaming is like that, or it can be.
The reason? I have a website! and I'm incredibly excited about this :)
I hope you get a chance to try this out, it really is one of my fave new recipes.
Choice, or perceptions of the ability to choose have been evident in education for some years. The schools that have been perceived to be ‘good’ are over subscribed, they are staffed by excellent teachers and people move house to be able to send their children to them. In some areas, where people are particularly mobile and affluent this may be the case. In healthcare choice in relation to maternity has been a particularly popular phenomenon with some people. Choice of the place you have your baby, whether this is home, a midwife led unit or obstetrics unit, or whether it is about choosing one hospital provider over another is very important to some people. Exercising choice can be a tricky thing. For one thing you have to know what choices are available, and in maternity you have to understand something of your own level of risk in exercising that choice. Perhaps your pregnancy is medically or socially risky when it comes to making some of those choices, perhaps you don’t have the means to travel 30 miles to a chosen different hospital. Perhaps also the services in your area struggle to attract the right mix of skilled staff, not because they are providing a poor service but because they are geographically situated close to an area where staff can attract higher pay.
Remember: the more the foundation is thick, the greater its covering effect.
Pita pizza with roasted garlic red sauce and fennel seed, Gardein chunks, black olives, Spanish onions, hot banana peppers, Cheddar Daiya.
Hey! – remember why Israel occupies the West Bank, the Golan Heights etc – it’s because, in 1967, the countries surrounding it were foolish enough to threaten to attack Israel (not for the first time) in an attempt to wipe it off the face of the map… They lost their gamble… and, in six days – spookily the same amount of time in which the Jewish God allegedly created the Universe – Israel created more defensible borders. Like him, they rested on the seventh day.
My brother and nephew will be coming over because my nephew wanted to see him one last time (which melts and breaks my heart all at the same time). For us humans, we’ll be having Pizza, but George will eat like a king.
Many people unfortunately are blind to the true nature of Islam. They are blind because they do not realize what Islam is and mistakenly believe that it is a religion just like any other religion.
Let him rest
With five brushing modes and a two-minute timer, the makers promise to improve gum health in as little as 14 days.
Children:
**Not very often do we feel compelled to preface a post, well today is a bit different. Our opinion today is wide-ranging and all over the place (for a reason) it’s up to you dear peep reading in your jammies on this fine morning to decide where you want to take this discussion today. So without further ado we present you this monstrosity!**
Wondering if you’re doing the same
If we treat each other with respect
Caterpillar = Butterfly:
* Paper: Core'dinations, My Mind's Eye, Papertrey Ink
Facebook - set up a facebook account and set up a landing page - even set it up to look like your site template. This allows people to "like" your business on Facebook thus spreading the word about your business. Give them a reason to like you on Facebook by explaining to them why they should and what benefits they may receive - like discounts, daily tips, DIY articles or notifications of contests and drawings. There are over 750 million Facebook users and it's growing everyday - can you afford to miss this free opportunity to advertise your site?
By following tips on how to win back girlfriend you could probably avoid the errors which introduced the end of your marriage to start with. a romantic relationship is a are employed in improvement so you’ll encounter lumps within the roads, witnessing and with these lumps is exactly what will make the partnership stand the test of time.
“I thought I could make the shoes look like they had patterns,” she explained. “It’s quite a process, though. You slump it and you fuse it. There are a few people who make a vessel out of it. But I haven’t seen anybody so far make a sculpted form out of it.”
There is always next year. There will be next year. They are still my team and they will always be. Go Braves.
With these trips, I always find myself coming back on the Friday night and, where possible, I prefer to spend the night in Dublin rather than driving down to Nenagh in the dead of night. When I *do* stay in Dublin, it’s at the Bewley’s Airport Hotel. I park the car at the hotel when flying out and, on my return, spend the Friday night in the hotel and drive home on the Saturday morning.
Filet medallion with shrimp pancake and apricot rouille
Pagan holiday
76. What? Do you want one of us to come over there and bite you are something?
Micah - "Mommy doesn't have a job, but I will tell you what her job is, cleaning up the kitchen, cleaning up the bathroom...."
While I am putting a load of whites in the washer (and remembering to put the Water Selection dial to “Cold” because our washer labels are mixed-up), I had this thought:
In other words, man's best friends may have originated from more than one ancient ancestor, contrary to what some DNA evidence previously has indicated.
Key was properly buried by the Ospremites and with this grim information in hand they returned to their ship and continued on to Narisban to wait for Cpt. Hammond and the Bird. In Narisban the crew met a certain drunkard named Ellis Blackwood who claimed to have recently escaped a tiny island by raft and had some harrowing tales of pirates, four armed apes and an addled sea barbarian. Cpt. Cassidy was troubled by this especially since her crew had not found any other life on that island. She promised to return with the Bird and check again for their comrades.
The Winners are...
I had heard a few of their songs like “Mamma Mia” and “SOS” on the radio here in the US when I was a kid, but it was when I moved to West Germany in 1976 that I saw just how truly popular they were. ABBA was literally everywhere in Europe in the mid 1970′s. On radio, TV, on shirts, posters, books, you name it… Everywhere you looked was ABBA ABBA ABBA. We lived in an upstairs apartment above a German family. I think the only English the German boy downstairs knew was “Do you like Agnetha or Anni-Frid?”
This was also the year I discovered that Poison Ivy likes to hang out with its cousin, English. Hmmm.
9. The Reward
Have you had a gel manicure? What did you think?
What do you see in our eyes
I've never backed up my blog - does anyone else do this????
It continues to amaze me that decisions like signing to Def Jam and becoming Jimmy Fallon's house band have somehow resulted in The Roots releasing darker and artsier albums at a quicker pace the last few years than they were able to at any earlier point in their career. Undun is less sonically arresting than Game Theory but moody in a more involving, seductive way than How I Got Over, and even if the whole narrative aspect of the album kind of goes over my head "The OtherSide" knocks.
Arvo signed up at least ten writers as a result of these approaches, some with multiple books (those are only the writers whose names I know; according to my sources, there are probably many more). Both royalty-only and licensing-fee-plus-royalties contracts were offered; the licensing fees ranged from hundreds to thousands of dollars, depending on the number of books involved. Publication was supposed to begin in September.
Yeastie Girlz - Ovary Action (original Lookout! pressing with the Laytonville address)
On the ride home, she sits quietly in the second row of our van. From the front, I tell her how proud I am. I talk about my own experiences playing in the festival as a young girl. I tell her that to courageously tackle something (and finish well that thing that brings you fear), that is the best I could wish for. Tenacity. Perserverance. It is what makes my children top of the class.
The one I probably did this to the most was my sister. She and I shared a bedroom on and off and at different times, we both said things and did things that were not the way we would ever want to be captured on a family home movie. For this, I am genuinely sorry. Thankfully, we did have some wonderful times full of fun days in the mix too.
I know I've asked the question before, but do you know your character's personalized plates? And what about the car they would be on?
‘Cause if you love 'em then you should put a sling on 'em
And last , but certainly not least, I had the privilege to go on an outing with my mom last week to Country Roads Antiques in Orange, California. This place is so fantastic. The eye candy is to die for. I could have spent all day there going booth by booth. We did not have all day;( I will be back again to spend more time there. It was truly delightful and it was really fun being with my mom.
After talking with another mom, I learned of another pool that is only 3 minutes farther away than the one we've gone to for the last two years and it has LOTS more shade. Shade is a must for us parents who have to sit in the summer heat fully-clothed for 30 minutes while the kids cool off in the water. When we first arrived I was excited to see not only awnings over the bleachers, but a grassy area with large umbrellas to sit under!
When looking at mysteries of this kind, some wise people have said, “Follow the money.” Prior to the Civil War, wealth was fairly evenly spread across the land – North and South. Lincoln was backed heavily by New York bankers, who greatly benefitted from his rule. In the 1870s, wealth heavily concentrated in New York City, while the South was reduced to abject poverty, and would remain so for nearly a century.
The gooseberries and currents all are either flowering or have already set fruit. The Orus 8 Jostaberry has the most berries on them, so far. We may get a pound or so of fruit from each. Four of the five varieties of autumn olives have flowers almost ready to open or are blooming right now. It looks like we may get small crops from five of the seven blueberries and a pound or so from the Darrow variety.
What if you do something so hurtful, and un-godly as you are looking for answers that you wouldn’t blame someone for writing it all off? What happens when community feels like a group of wounded people thrashing around and accidentally inflicting more wounds? Lately, I don’t see God in the journey. I don’t believe that God can redeem this mess. Even when I know that I should. Even when I desperately want to. I know that God works through the lives of imperfect people. I was in the Sunday School circuit long enough to have the stories of David, Moses, Paul, down pat. But I need to know, do you flounder too? Are there days and moments when you are sure you aren’t good enough? Does God still think I am a woman after His own heart? Even when I don’t?
Eventually, all the pieces of paper, hair, manure and kitchen waste will evolve into beautiful dark brown, sweet smelling compost. Planting your seeds and seedlings into soil enriched with compost will give them the best chance of survival, but compost making is an ongoing garden task. If you can make a lot of it in summer, and you live in a snowy climate, store it in your shed over winter for the coming season. If you're in a milder climate, it's fine to just having it sitting in the garden waiting to be used. Making compost might seem like a chore in the beginning, but it will become second nature to you, and when that happens, you'll reduce the amount of household waste you give to other people to dispose of for you and you'll have a continuous supply of the best soil conditioner and fertiliser.
Similar meetings in 2005 and early 2006 resulted in a circumcision protocol issued by the state which suggested mohels rinse their mouths with mouthwash immediately before doing MBP to stop transmission of the virus. The protocol was widely ridiculed by public health and medical professionals and was revoked in 2007 after Governor Pataki left office, The Jewish Week reported last week.
LÄPPLE: Ratzinger had to analyze Saint Bonaventure’s perspective on Revelation. In those years the debate on the concept of Revelation was very alive. A new view was coming in, according to which Revelation was first and foremost the historical action of God, in the progress of the history of salvation, and could not be identified with the communication of some truths to reason through concepts, as claimed in the
Yesterday the blog reported:
“Well let’s see,” Ella says. “How best to explain it……..I guess it means you try to live godly or to be like God.”
water as required
In my humble opinion, raising your metabolism is THE holy grail of weight loss! Who wouldn’t want to be burning fat throughout the day without doing anything? So naturally I assume you are wondering how you can raise your metabolism and turn your body into a fat burning machine right?? Don’t worry; I got you covered! I will be sharing the tricks I use very shortly so make sure you are subscribed to my blog (it’s FREE!) & following me on twitter (@watchherlosew8) to get notified when this article becomes available!
While the quiche was in the oven I prepared a lovely carrot salad, adapted from a recipe by (my favorite) Mark Bittman. This is also a dish that can be made ahead. If you do make it ahead though be sure you stir it every so often because the vinaigrette will settle to the bottom.
Third, proofreader. Seriously. There were parts of that letter where I was like “Is this a paragraph or did he just shake his dictionary over his keyboard really hard and these are the words that fell out?”
"Buff Orpington, two Golden Sex Links, and a Rhode Island Red, all good chicks", he said.
Babinsky (New York: Paulist Press, 1993), 89. Porete translates the principle of monastic solitude (fr. monos alone) beyond the literal. Cf. Anthanasius’s modeling of Mary: “Mary does not desire to be seen by anyone, but she prayed that God might be her examiner. She did not desire to leave her home. She knew nothing of public places; rather she remained assiduously within her home, living a withdrawn life, like a honey bee . . . She prayed to God, alone with the Alone” (De virginitate, cited in Jean Prou, Walled About With God: The History and Spirituality of Enclosure for
this is just before her Year 7 Graduation late last year.
and it's little old me that's hosting this week!
yuh could bring it in a flask.
-Everywhere I went, people asked me where I was from. Apparently I have quite an accent? Haha!
And yes, at this point, both sandwiches and briefings come in handy. But they must be rightly related to David’s victory. Without it, David’s sandwiches may as well be poison.
If anyone has any suggestions of what I can do to make this entertainment center look more attractive, please give me some ideas. I have tweaked this thing a million times and never like what I do completely.
Whilst the issue was always very prominent in Scotland, wider UK interest was provoked by the scandalous revelations concerning the News of the World, which led to its closure.
What was that? A boy’s in trouble?
I remember the days when I had a boyfriend and used to do the same to my single friends – so I can only assume that I have become the Token Single Friend. Whether intentionally or subconsciously, I have become the new token single girl. I’m not sure if I like this idea, because with great power comes great responsibility. The token single friend has a duty to her relationship bound friends to bring the life to the party! She must go forth and spread her seed and bring back tales of good and bad first dates, random guys hitting on her and kinky one night stands. She must return to her friends with gossip involving sex games, mind fucks and big dicks. Not sure if I’m ready for this right now. I am wayyy too picky with guys for random fucks. And I’m too much of a workaholic to go out partying all the time. Oh well, I guess I’m just going to have to man up and bring the party!!
At the same time, I was surprised this week by a note from one of our readers overseas who asked if there was anything special Lana and I needed at this time. He had been blessed by our ministry and wanted to do something in return. Although I hesitated to share our personal needs with him, in the end I did share a few things that we had been praying about. Within a few hours, he had responded by saying he wanted to send a gift that would not only cover those needs that I had shared, but that would double the amount of what I had shared!
The file contains multiple pages, the first page cuts 2 red bases with the thumb tab, the second page cuts 4 of the white stripe overlays, the third page cuts 2 of the tent insert card, the fourth page cuts 4 of the ticket inserts, and the 5th page cuts 1 red base without the thumb tab for a traditional card that opens completely. To create the pull out card simple fold in the middle of the card lining up all sides. Then add a thin strip of glue or double stick tape to the top and right side of the card leaving the bottom open to pull out the insert.
Meanwhile, their place in the student trenches is taken by more Home-Counties Hillaries on a three-year stretch. It's like a First World War opera by Philip Glass - slight tweaks to the same theme, with some modulation but no development. And then you graduate.
She asked how Mthethwa would justify his behaviour while police officers who often put their lives at risk earned next to nothing each month.
Maybe a dumpster full of bowling balls.
The history of basketball at The Citadel can be likened to the long-running Peanuts bit where Charlie Brown tries to kick the football, only to have Lucy jerk it away from him time and time again, except in this case the ball is jerked away from him about 10 seconds before he can even swing his leg to kick it…but he keeps trying to kick it anyway.
c. Star America Aviation License is attached
Now all that's left for me to do is learn to use my camera properly to take better pictures of my creations. ;)
* divestiture and the fruits doctrine under Article 32;
I can see her lyin’ back in her satin dress
Me: "Even with a referral, the best way to query is via email--"
I am putting to use some of the Photographs that I have.....I have made this one for you to play with if you would like.
However, replacing ACs has, as so many things in life, consequences. The first of these is the necessity for a crane to visit and heft all the new compressor units up onto the roof and bring the old units down. They're quite big, one of the units is a 6-tonne, two more are 4-tonnes. And then we have a namby pamby 2-tonne as well. But the roof thing has meant no AC in the house until the new units are installed. The first of these came online yesterday.
﻿﻿﻿My weekly visit to the site has been postponed until tomorrow. Persistent heavy rain prevented any kind of activity today including a visit we had planned to Montmelo. The motor circuit is just down the road from here in Cardedeu and home to the Catalunya Grand Prix. The plan had been to get there early to join the ‘petrol heads’ watch the ultimate Formula 1 practice day prior to the start of the F1 season later this month. Personally, I’m no great fan of what I grudgingly consider a sport and the thrill was planned more for our son and to experience first-hand the speed and certainly the noise that permeates across this part of Catalunya whenever a race is on.
I get up, and we walk away, Lynne grabbing my hand to hold as we do.
So people, if you’ve learned anything from this long rambly blog today, here are some highlights to take with you:
This journey is certainly exciting and we haven’t even really begun!
As Witterings from Witney reminds us, even The Boy agrees that the politicians are always the servants and never the masters of the people. We need to make it so.
2tsp mixed spice
20-Mile Race: 35 Finishers
Where the river never dries…
With each glance and every little movement you show it
So David Beckham goes out to play France by himself
While he gets a foot massage from a servant boy, della Rovere gossips about Giulia being installed in Orsini’s old palace. The more you think about it, the dumber it becomes. How could Alexander have not realized people were going to notice that and realize why he’d done it? Della Rovere tells Micheletto to question the staff at the palace and try to get proof of lechery.
Musing upon the king my brother’s wreck
After cleaning myself up and putting on some warm clothes, I got into bed with my baby and just stared at him.
Many writers are put off by the inconvenience that postal submissions often entail. I can say assuredly that I’m certainly not. If that’s the way my preferred agent wants to receive them, then that’s the rules I will follow.
There are clearly a lot of cultural and translation barriers to a non-Japanese fully understanding these poems — among other problems, I still don’t quite get why Tsubouchi wants me to be a hippo. But it struck me forcefully that these poets were clearly not interested in following the “rules” about haiku, particularly about haiku subject matter, that so many English haiku poets seem insistent on and fearful of breaking.
Don’t we realize at a point of time that the ones we fought with were our own blood? Haven’t we regretted about it? Of course, yes! Do we see the same war even today? Yes! just for three cents or four cents of land, a mango tree, a piece of wooden antique, sometimes even for the space in almirah, we fight. And yes after hours, days and years we realize that they are just momentary and the people are the loved ones. Similarly Arjuna realized all of a sudden that the people he was supposed to fight is his relatives.
1064 **D-I/5/1990. “On Montaigne, Death and Philosophy: Essays, I, 20, A Preliminary Inquiry.” First Friday Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, The Cultural Center, Chicago Public Library, Chicago, Illinois. Dedicated to the memory of Anne M. Cohler (1940-1989). (Incorporated in Item C-2001(6), above, pp. 342-57.)
One foot in front of the other … wave to Mother with her beautiful scarf … march to the death.
A mirror of agony
Twitter’s basic etiquette is generally follow-me and I-might-follow-you, so you must be following people who have some interest in your product, and they might just return the favor. So really the trick is to *find* local followers, and follow them. (I’d like to point out that many blogs would just BS around that concept without any further information, but this one’s going to give you something meaty to chew on.)
Dates and venue will be put up the website. You will also be intimated through your physical acceptance letter.
A sidebar story that happened to me fifteen years ago, and that my subconscious must have tapped into yesterday when I was writing with my students on the topic of gratitude:
After I got over the awkward phase, and finally regained the ability to talk freely, I came to a few conclusions.
The Anchorage Police Department has a few new officers on the street, but they’re not the human kind: After graduating from the academy last year, the newest members of the department’s K-9 Unit were introduced to the public Saturday during the annual “Dollars for Dogs” meet-and-greet.
I liked Taylor’s first memoir (see yesterday’s post), but I loved this one. She writes about various “practices” – physical labor, Sabbath, prayer, simply looking another person in the eye – that can help ground us in the world we live in, and thereby give us a glimpse of the eternal in daily life. I might be writing a whole separate post about this book. So many gorgeous sentences, nuggets of wisdom, honest admissions, practical advice. I got this from the library, but I’ll be buying a copy. Love.
I got my daughter up at about 6am so she could see Kate coming down the aisle. We ooohed and aahed at some of the ENORMOUS hats (and others that resembled a jellyfish coming gently to rest atop one's immaculate coiffure)
I’ve been thinking a bit about the whole Spiritual-But-Not-Religious (SBNR) classification. Folks tell us it’s growing; anecdotally, I’ve got a number of Facebook friends who identify this way. As the Church writ broadly looks at mission/evangelism/formation, this is the group that looms largest. Have we done a decent job of asking who they are, what they want, and what will be necessary to communicate the gospel to them?
I choose to take pride in myself and my company’s image in my community! Amen!
As a young Member of Parliament, Wilberforce was preoccupied with his political reputation, standard of living, and social status. However, during his time in office, he encountered stories about slavery that tugged at his heart. Rather than brushing aside the feelings, he resolved to take action in order to reform this culture.
Looking towards the mountains... The irises are sprouting either side of the chemin d'eau and promise to be bold and beautiful by May... When they flower their white petals will break the expanse of lawn and soften the look of the stone waterway...
Also, I have changed the name of the blog.
In other news. I've just applied to join the first leg of a trip called The Great Baltic Adventure. http://www.wix.com/seanor/gba I wont bore you with all the details, but its basically a 5 leg trip, sailing from London to St Petersburg in a 60ft clipper carrying 12+ cask of beer. Sounds bloody good to me.
And while we're on the subject of staring in dumbfounded silence....
Which is the better investment?
Zest and juice of 1 lemon
Alright, so Katniss Everdeen is portrayed by Jennifer Lawrence, well, I never heard her before, but I think she resembles Emily Browning, alright.
My climbing partner managed to get away from work and domestic duties for a few hours Monday and braved the drive from Boulder to Fort Collins to come climb with me at Horsetooth. It ended up being a lot of horsing around…pun fully intended.
Nope. The other hand wanted me to pay attention to this ridiculous pipe dream that had always been lurking inside of me, stifled by the tiny bit of practicality I possess. So I looked at it. I noted that it was impractical and would likely lead to failure. I turned the hand over and saw very smart reasons why I had always pushed it down before.
Add the pre-cooked potatoes and salt and toss around, making sure they are well coated in the masala.
Step Two: Pick a visa service. I choose ZVS they have a center in San Fransisco.
Principe di Calabria - con bergamotto, gelsomino e pan spagna
Anyway, I soon discovered there was quite a market for dirty music back in the day - it just wasn't played on the radio. All of the ones I uncovered were pretty awful - obviously not meant to be appreciated for their musicianship as their ability to turn a risque phrase and lay it between the lines.
The next day she came home with a beautiful painting of it all. Exactly the same.
Pig: (snort snort through the nose)
Digital publishing is only just entering it’s infancy in the Netherlands, and it remains the single area holding back independent publishers and self-published authors. A recent survey and report on the future of publishing undertaken by Price Waterhouse & Coopers, reveals a great deal about how far behind the Netherlands is in digital and ebook growth.
Kraft Cardstock
Start from today, spend more time with your family and friends.
This one I made specially for my son Elliot- hence the skull embellishement. What young guy doesn't love a nice skull. I found those at Michaels and they are from the Jolee's Boutique line. I din't think the in-laws would be too keen on having one on theirs.
The benefits are almost mind blowing, you go from a great meal to a sensational and memorable meal but really the best way to get that is to be there watching it so it doesn’t burn. Trust me it’s worth it however painful it might be, you won’t regret it.
Scant information has previously been made available about Apple’s licensing deals with Nokia or IBM.
6. Open toed shoes are forbidden. Actually, who cares? But if you do happen to wear an open toed shoe, please paint your toe nails. This applies to both men and women. We embrace esthetically pleasing toes. We take pride in having the best toes in the industry.
Black Radishes by Susan Lynn Meyer
What do you think? Will you accept my challenge, or is my soap box too darn high, and I need to get off before someone kicks it out from under me?
Gloom Uprising – Don Cavalli
There is no shame in whoever you are.
I think I will pack a measuring tape into my own hospital bag in a couple of weeks too. Honestly, I’m thinking that photos sent to family away will be all the more amazing when they get a sense of size alongside of the pictures of sweet little feet and hands and face and everything else.
12.5 percent: sperm donor
http://video.barnesandnoble.com/DVD/Mister-Roberts/Henry-Fonda/e/12569736351/?itm=1&USRI=mr+roberts with Henry Fonda, James Cagney and William Powell. I love William Powell as Nick in The Thin Man series of movies http://video.barnesandnoble.com/DVD/The-Complete-Thin-Man-Collection/William-Powell/e/12569673991/?itm=2 with Myrna Loy. Some folks know this movie more for the canine star, Asta. Anyway, Powell plays the older philosophical doctor on a cargo ship during WWII in Mr. Roberts. Fonda, who plays Mr. Roberts, wants to be in the action but Cagney, the tyrannical captain, won't approve his transfer to another ship. It is a delightful movie and a nice way to end our anniversary.
Tunic: All Saints
On the other hand, I do not have one single electronic product from Turkey, and yet I love Turkish cuisine (the only thing I have in common with Claudia Roth). And I find the extroverted and noisy Turks more likable than the uncommunicative and quiet Japanese, whose mood you cannot read by looking at them.
Work work work like always. Orlando is coming sooner and sooner and I really need the break and the yearly reminder of why I love my job. The post-Joint Commission haze is fading and it’s back to business and chart audits as usual. Epic starts May 5th and I’m actually looking forward to it because it should eliminate a lot of issues. Should. Hopefully. Hopefully. Seriously- hopefully. I feel like I need a refresher course though…
I see people changing lanes without indicators, driving too fast on the road and tailgating other drivers, jumping their turn at a stop sign and numerous other offences. I regularly see people only indicating when they have to turn left or right somewhere and not while changing lanes. In which school did these people learn to drive??? I wonder. When it is a 120 kmph zone, most people are flying past at 150 or 160. When it is an 80 zone, people automatically seem to assume 100 and upwards. I even sometimes see people doing what appears to be close to 120 in a 60 kmph zone. That’s double the speed limit! What is the hurry? Where is everyone rushing off to? If one dug deeper, it would probably be a combination of poor time management and complete disregard for the rules.
● £99,335 from Judith Day between 2001 and 2008.
Mani Ratnam told me that Bombay was going to be about the riots and that we would see a lot of the riots. So we needed to make what came before the riots as beautiful as possible. I suggested that we shoot in the rains and he said, okay.
Time marches on and as my father told me once (and I hated him for it - but sometimes what else can you say...........) "When life gives you lemons, make lemonade.
It is therefore on behalf of all the children at the school that I request a donation of books for our library.”
Once you have your image in you may want to blur it a little to make it recede more into the background so it gives your image depth.
4. My left mitten
”Oh my God. I can’t believe I made it. Now, could somebody pack my body in ice, insert an intravenous tube into my arm, and transport me to the nearest trauma center?”
VIOLENT PROFESSIONALS
Or, to put it the Mulholland Dr. way:
To augment the top part, I needed a wedge-shaped piece that would be wider toward the right. It would be tall enough that I needed some complexity at the right, so I sewed a slice from a strip set to another strip set and put it in place.
because as you know by now
Around here, we enjoyed a great, long weekend of beautiful springtime weather.
What I feed. Spring is a leg
All too often, artists are not keeping the records that can help be a blueprint to more fans, more sales and larger audiences. Tracking progress from your social media promotion to your offline marketing and everywhere in between can not only show how you what is working, it can also show others.
Grandparents Plus aims to fight this injustice through our Keep Families Together campaign. Our research shows that when deciding where children should be placed local authorities often give greater weight to the ‘permanency’ of adoption instead of recognising the love, stability and family links that grandparents and other family carers can provide. Families are being torn apart because adoption is seen as the default option.
This is how the Heart and Feather Wholecloth quilt was given away. You can print this pattern as many times as you like, teach with it, and print it for students. Anything you want to do with it, you can, and you don't have to ask permission first.
The bad news is that a lot of false gospels are spreading too--
8-11hrs at job 1
Yours Simply,
Amber orange color with a sweet citrusy smell. This beer is very drinkable and is easy to introduce to any beer drinker. I would recommend this beer to anyone, especially those who tend not to stray away from the American lights...Bud, Miller, Coors, etc.
To the sultry, biding herds, I said,
their vulnerable open-minded,
I have a new nickname. It’s “Aba Chop Bar.”
Well, then, the law ought to be changed. It says so much about the arrogance of the state Legislature that it could get away with rewriting New York's Freedom of Information Law so that it was largely exempt from it.
You'll notice a couple of other things from these close-up photos. The first is that quilting a zigzag quilt is not just a matter of cutting long strips of fabric in a zig zag shape and sewing them together. You can see that these are actually squares made up of two triangles of fabric that are sewn together (called "half-square triangles" in quilter speak). Quilters have clever ways of making these things in the most efficient way possible. So half-square triangles are made by sewing two squares of different fabrics together and cutting them in a diagonal to create two half-square triangles.
The only encouraging sign in the CNRDRE’s behavior is that so far it has refrained from demonizing the governments and regional bodies opposing it, leaving more critical responses to some of its most radical supporters. But talk of military intervention by Mali’s neighbors grows louder by the day.
They also have problems with depth perception. This has serious consequences in their future ability to work in professions that require good vision in both eyes. Affected children also have increased risk of blindness should something happen to the good eye.
with death and tease the devil?
Rewards: 2 Anniversary Tokens.
Can you IMAGINE that happening in an office?!
Long pause ... you can tell they are processing this information.
I feel a little ambivalent about A's newfound pushing tendencies. On the one hand, I don't want her to go around shoving people out of the blue. And I want her to be empathetic (which she was when she saw how sad the boys were -- she said sorry and gave them each a friendly pat). But I also want her to feel like she doesn't have to kiss another kid if she doesn't want to. I always feel a little awkward when I say something like, "he just wanted to give you a little kiss." I know that when she's a teenager, I'll be singing a very different tune. It will go something like this: "If someone wants to kiss you and you don't want to say 'No.' If the person doesn't listen, then punch them in the face and kick them where it counts."
DCWV Cotton Bloom stack, Stampin Up! Thank You stamp, A la Mode embossing powder, Darice Heat tool, Versamark embossing pad, Peeled Paint Distress Ink, Studio G glitter glue (on sentiment), Tim Holtz Curiosity stamp on left background, Cutter Bee scissors, gems unknown stash
I’m keen to see how the “Velib” pilot program changes things. For some reason, I think I’ll be more likely to ride these bikes than I am my own Café Racer. I think there will be greater safety in numbers. And I hope drivers and pedestrians get more used to the bicyclists, making things safer and more pleasant all around.
The Mia is compact enough that it can travel with you. It has a charger you can easily plug in anywhere- no batteries to worry about changing. The Mia is also waterproof for easy cleaning.
“In order to understand the meaning of life you must be able to respect and appreciate the importance of life, only then will you see its true value and meaning”
Don't forget to watch some NCAA Basketball. Horns on at 6:10! Be nice to the orange cladded ones. If the Horns win they're much more likely to buy beer. Now if I can find my car keys. They were hidden my some well meaning soul I think...or crushed on the dance floor.
Certainly, I haven't exhausted the list of political parties in America. But this sampling provides an idea of just how radical all modern political agendas remain. If one works backward in time from today, the mark of true conservatism would be a honest belief in and embrace of the hunter-gatherer way of life. What I am trying to point out is that today we are all, by virtue of our position in history, radicals. True conservatives are non-existent--except perhaps for a few hunter-gatherers. We are forced then by circumstances to choose which brand of radicalism to practice.
Rough nights.
This church, which dates from about 1540 and replaced an older one, is now not only used as a religious meeting-place, but also as exhibition centre and to host concerts as well.
There I saw one I knew, and stopped him, crying “Stetson!
“One reason, I think, is that it’s easy to condemn homosexuality if you are not gay. It is much harder than condemning pride, or lust or greed, things that most practicing Christians have struggled with. It is all too easy to make homosexuality about “those people,” and not me. If I were to judge someone for their inflated sense of pride, or their tendency to worship various cultural idols, I would feel some personal stake, some cringe of self-judgment. Not so with homosexuality. ”
Rating system:
25g/1oz milk chocolate (or more plain chocolate if you don't have)
The list goes on of new friends I had been introduced to. There was Dope, or Mary Jane if you prefer. Lucy in the Sky with Diamonds was another popular friend of mine. But my favorite friend had become Crystal. I simply couldn’t live without Crystal. It was my biggest addiction and the biggest drain of my time and resources. Of course, dealing then became a full-time job, just to keep up with the habit. But oh the benefits! I was the highlight of every party. I could have any person that I wanted. I couldn’t even say how many people I had shared my body with. It was usually someone new every week or so. Whoever happened to be in the room at the time enjoying the same pipe as me. “It’s the life you’ve always wanted. Why would anyone ever think of living a clean life? That’s so boring!” I nodded in agreement. I thought of all the weight I had lost and how good-looking I was now that Crystal was an integral part of my life. Shoot, I could stay up for days on end just enjoying whatever activity I wanted. I stopped dead in my tracks. Another voice, this time on my other side. I turned, expecting to see someone walking beside me in the night. What was really there made my blood race through my veins.
François Girard succeeded in producing the show that should reconcile everyone. The only problem that I believe is worth emphasizing is that the interaction among protagonists is not at the level of modern theatrical standards. There are several patches during the show when it started to look as a rehashed show from in the 80's (especially in the first act). Other than that, I can only talk about the positives.
That said, renting and then buying a house for myself in Provence is one of the best things I’ve ever done. I’m so glad I was persistent because I found exactly what I wanted. But I could definitely have lived without the time-wasting drama and almost certainly would have gotten a better deal if I had had someone to help.
So, the book launch week is over, the party favors put away, the blog blitz done. And here I am. Wondering what’s next.
I have been strong and patient in my whole life although I had been get many fun..
4. Heat up some oil in a very large frying pan, add the meatballs and cook the meatballs until well browned and cooked through (this may take quite a while). Work in batches if necessary.
After a very hectic weekend i was glad son went back to school today, so i could sit back and chill for a couple of hours !!! Saturday i took H swimming then we went to a farm activity centre where they had a bird of prey day on, whilst OH stayed home and did some DIY, Sunday OH took son and dog to rugby - yes H actually plays tag rugby at 4 years of age and in the afternoon we did a farm walk and cream tea - the walk was supposed to be an hour long and ended up being 2 hours, so by that time H and his friends Chloe and Joshua were literally hanging and didn't know what day of the week it was !!!
I use my “down time” for my handy-dandy travel journal where I jot down all the crazy, weird and informative stuff in my mind when I’m on a bus, waiting for a plane or eating in a rural restaurant as if a camera is taking candid shots for a “Lonely Planet” episode.
Away went the sunshine spells as bandit grey clouds wash their way in from the Arctic, brisk cold air and misty black fogs bring an unwelcome sadness to my days. Is there ash in the clouds above me? Is it thick and invisible in the atmosphere? Perhaps when we are older the children doctors will tell us our lungs are coated with volcanic tears. Perhaps not. I can not help but think of those in Iceland when I see those dark skies.
My friend Kelly Derryberry once wrote something very insightful: “If it doesn’t end with love, it didn’t start with love either.”
Sarahx
Do I just continue my quest to be Freshly Pressed and post the pictures I take around my yard like this one I took a couple of days ago? No editing on this required, not one adjustment, nature is beautiful…
Roy Booth has completed the stage script for my short story, SHERLOCK HOLMES AND THE CASE OF THE NECROMANCER. I have read through it...and wow! Roy's reputation is much deserved. He did an amazing job and I am on fire--almost literally--to see the first performance, which may be held right here in Bemidji.
Remember: people with REAL OPTIONS do not need to prove it, b/c it will be noticed without them even trying. Game playing and manipulation by flirting to keep your partner interested in you is for the birds!
Dates: Select Nights November–
Did you try to suppress or change your sexual orientation or gender differences through an ex-gay ministry, reparative therapy, or on your own? Please take the survey.
2. She can take pictures with her boobs via an implanted camera. She also uses them as weapons, in slow motion, no doubt.
Yesterday I was thinking how awkward would be to tell my mom and dad the impact of their divorce on me. A lot o stuff happened to me. I love to be loved and love back, but I used to think that love existed only in stories, since the two people I loved the most began to hate each other. How could I love someone if my parents didn't love each other? What am I then? When people have child, in my opinion, is to express their love, they love each other so much that they decided to unite the two bodies to create another one, who will tell stories about a wonderful love. That's what I think of my non-existent-kids-that-will-born-someday. I am reasult of a lot of love that at some point, reached the top and they couldn't do anything but go down, and it got so down that it fell apart and did not want to get up. But since I'm in a relationship with lovely Daniel, I think that I can have something wonderful that will never end. We might get hurt, we might fight, but I know that our love is stronger than anything and we will make it, together. I don't want to wake up some day saying "I don't love you anymore", my entire life will be a lie. We should be able to live the way we want with the people we love and that's exactly what's happening to me. I loved, I got hurt, I forgave, we cleared things and now we're moving on. We're stronger now. I don't want to like mom and dad, but I'm glad they're divorced, because of that I found the love of my life.
The difference is that, after the attack on Pearl Harbor, Roosevelt went before Congress and got the US to declare war on Japan, while, as Peter Sagal put it, had Bush, Jr. been President in '41, he would have declared war on Bulgaria.
But I have been on a diet and I was determined not to cheat.
I decided to make a button wreath, very simple but fun I think, I wouldn't mind a full size one for my front door this Christmas. I just love buttons and have a huge collection, I just can't help buying more if I see them.
Some of my recently created kits are now available at Digitals and are on sale for 40% of through August 31, along with the rest of my store. Here’s what is now loaded into the store:
9 men
Bake. Everything. I'm not kidding. If it's new, bake it. Unless it's a lettuce, then don't do that. Grill lettuce! Not actually joking here, grilled lettuce is delicious. Almost everything reveals it's true (delicious) flavour when baked or roasted (which is about 40 degrees higher than baking). This can give you a real feel for the flavours of your food, plus it almost never tastes bad.
Wake up Africa!!
The New York Times published a great preview article of the museum. Among the objects on display are a 22,000-pound anchor from the USS Austin, and a mangled piece of the USS Arizona, which was built at the Navy Yard and later became one of the casualties of the attack on Pearl Harbor in 1941. There are also many objects that speak to the rough and tumble nature of the neighborhood surrounding the Navy Yard. "It was the Barbary Coast of New York," the center's curator Daniela Romano told the Times.
Tacloban, like most Philippine cities (if not all) has water problem. I don’t have statistics at hand but based on my observations, not every city folk has access to safe water. In downtown areas, there are city-owned artisan well which supply water for laundry and washing. But this is not ideal. Ideally, each home should have 27/7 safe piped water supply. Water should not be served only to the affluent but also to the less privilege people. After all, everyone pays tax and everyone needs water to survive.
Etsy is the jam...seriously. You can find really unique stuff on there and the prices are generally awesome. I constantly source artwork, pillows, lighting, rugs, accessories, and vintage furniture from Etsy sellers. Trust me, if you haven't already shopped Etsy, you should! If my recommendation alone isn't enough, then here is a mélange of some of my latest favorites in a little vignette to entice you further...
So, basically, Tina Fey sat down and wrote a book about her life. Hilarity ensues. (Full disclosure: I listened to the audiobook. I have found that the best vehicles for memoirs are the authors reading their own words. I feel like I get more from it.)
2. Leaving things out of place allowing clutter to collect and make the room messy.
Mariage freres (sp) tea - also in the Marais
- Considering that England is only less than one quarter the size of India or the EU
- Carl Larsson and his wife had eight children.
Anyway, it has been nice to feel normal for at least a day. Tomorrow will probably be a little less, but at least I had one day!
Like their countryman Benni Hemm Hemm, Hjaltalín are not afraid of a horn or twenty. Other English village fair staples include the bashful vocal and a love of a sing-a-long chorus.
Belief let him lack.”
I'd love to sport all of these trends this coming Spring!
“Bob Bu Da” A personalized version of Bob The Builder.
neither
22) Delivery Rate - This tells you the percentage of your database that actually received your email in their inbox. A low delivery rate could be a sign that you have a low Sender Score.
If you want a totally satisfying snack for yourself, your kids or for a tray of appetizers to serve guests, this is the no bake, no cook, no fuss solution for your tastebuds.
Water, to green, to nothing like a snake.
Now there’s a statement to stop me in my nappy changing tracks. And why would he have come to this conclusion?
Stories – by Oscar Wilde
New camera, check.
On Wednesday, October 7, 2009
However, recently I have and it was interesting to hear one person say how much (s)he hated the actual business of writing. It set me thinking. We all know that it can be difficult, that there are days when nothing comes right - or even comes at all.
I've always loved Dove for their wonderful message at building self esteeem in women (Visit their Campaign for Real Beauty here) It's heartwarming when companies come together to help support George Herman House in every way possible, even with some wonderful products to help make the women feel special.
Darrell Leonard - trumpet, trombone
Then said Gunnlaug, “Now thou art no more meet for battle, nor will I fight with thee any longer, a maimed man.”
** Get a facial one week before your wedding. Why? take a piece of clear scotch tape, place it on the back of your hand, pull it off.. look at all those dead skin cells.. imagine putting make up on top of that?
In the bowl of your mixer (or a large bowl if you are making the buns by hand) mix together all the dry ingredients and the fruit. Make a little well in the middle and add the milk, melted butter , egg and your yeast mixture, and mix well. I use the dough hook attachment, but you could mix with a wooden spoon, then turn the whole lot onto a floured bench and knead for about 8-10 minutes. For more info on bread & kneading, see here.
The heap can be built up over a period of time but for optimum efficiency it should be no longer than 3 months. Now here’s the important bit – the heap has to have a solid base of paving slabs, you don’t want nutrient loss or worm activity with this method it’s all about fungi and bacteria breaking down the plant material and creating a serious amount of heat that kills off weeds, seeds etc.
Friday I finished D4 Crystal Star. I paper pieced it, and hand appliquéd the “leaves.”
1) Heat sugar and water in pot. You are doing this to make a simple syrup.
In a medium bowl, mix the salt into the water until dissolved. Soak the peeled, sliced cucumbers in the brine for about an hour. Rinse under cold water and drain. Meanwhile, combine the sugar, vinegar, and cream. Add in the sliced onion, then the rinsed cucumber. If the marinade does not cover the cucumbers, add additional vinegar and sugar (in equal parts) until the cucumbers are covered. Place a lid over the container and shake well until everything is combined. Refrigerate overnight. Serve with your favorite summer dinner.
cotton, locally manufactured and dyed – they quoted me Z$6060 per Metre or
Gosh I sure do love my little family of 3. We have been so blessed this past year. We had a few forks in the road and are very thankful for the paths we took. We have a great support system within our family where we are acknowledged, appreciated and genuinely loved. Our friends are the best we could ask for and our business just keeps growing. Here's to the second half of 2011 being as great as the first.
Casia and I took an amazing field trip to Colonial Williamsburg yesterday. Shortly after our arrival, Casia decided she wanted a colonial dress as an early birthday present. It looked so cute on her, I couldn't resist.
unheard by men
1. A New Day Yesterday
I have the distinct feeling the teddies like their crib too!
Eat those little balls of shit.
This year, we made some major educational changes. Boys #2-4 are now enrolled in our local public school full-time. That's a big change for a family that's practiced relaxed homeschooling for the past 6-and-a-half years! But you know what? It's working so far.
Amber Kingsnorth - The chairs are so comfy! Plus the shape and style are so classic. We wanted to come up with a way to make them suit our new space without compromising the things that we loved about them. By using such a large scale print on the backs, each chair is unique, showing a different piece of the pattern and combination of colours.
When the onion, peppers and garlic are all soft, dump in your beans and as much salsa as you like. You want this to be only lightly bubbling – just barely, so adjust your heat to low if necessary. Stir this occasionally for maybe ten minutes. Depending on how much liquid is in the salsa, you just want to ensure a nice, thick consistency that won’t leave salsa juice all over your plate. The beans should become ONE with the salsa. As a final touch, toss in any fresh, chopped tomato you may have. This is totally optional.
Republicans have removed rights to marriage equality. They have removed democratic rights in Michigan (and of course, other Republican-controlled states are looking to follow). They have removed many womens rights, and are continuing to remove other rights. They have removed voting rights. Republicans have been at the forefront of restricting civil liberties, and allowing law enforcement and intelligence agencies to spy on Americans.
I removed the chops from the grill and let them set for about 5 minutes while I got the rest of our dinner ready. I’d made the smoky barbeque sauce from class the day before and had reheated it for the chops. With salads and some roasted potatoes, dinner came together fairly quickly! And yum, yum, yum – those boar chops were so tender, so juicy… All I can tell you is that if you haven’t had wild pig, my friends, you should get yourself some!
- he is THE LOVE OF MY LIFE and i thank God for each and every single day with him as my baby.
The Sheraton Nassau Beach and Stuart Cove's Dive Bahamas are offering a shark adventure for guests who stay either three or five nights. A three night stay includes one two-tank shark dive for two people and a five night stay includes two two-tank shark dives. The experience include a free swim where divers swim along a wall with sharks following them. The second is a feeding dive where divers kneel in a semi-circle around a professional shark feeder. The sharks swim around the divers interested in the bait and not the divers- let's hope!
Things are quiet on the Cape in the winter. Many, many of the cute little downtown shops close their doors for the long winter months of January, February and March. Some close up shop from Columbus Day weekend to Memorial Day weekend.
I noticed it when we were out walking yesterday. The tall guy didn't seem to notice it. Maybe it was because we were like 3 miles away from it. But I did. The tall guy was just trying to get home. Something about needing a drink of water. But I persisted. I started to walk one direction, the tall guy wanted to go the other. Usually, he wins. But then I gave him my puppy eyes. He can't resist when I do the puppy eye thing. So, he said we would go see what I was so determined to find. We quickly crossed the street and went up the sidewalk. The closer we got, the faster I walked. Time seemed to stand still as we rushed toward our goal. All of a sudden, there it was!
"People still remember that the former lord president Salleh Abas was brought before a tribunal for writing a personal letter to the then agong. That was considered misconduct and resulted in Salleh being removed and disgraced.
This has brought me a lot of delight and a few stories that you’ll probably get to read one day. For now I’ll just give a run down of how the first few months go for them and an idea I have to make them better.
You see, you know the father
Whats My Name
You keep reading, keep educating yourself and one day you find out that all those fruits and veggies in the supermarket might not be as healthy as you thought they were. All those pesticides and poisons--not to mention that the blimey soil the stuff was grown in probably had no nutrients to pass along in the first place due to being so depleted of life by our wonderful corporate farming techniques. You find out that the flour and sugar you have been baking with has been bleached and processed beyond recognition and the vegetable oil in the cupboard is actually some sort of evil homogenated substance that no one should be consuming--let alone the people you love.
Do not be fooled by slick video editing. Sleeping outside in downtown Pittsburgh will not help anyone who is still night commuting in northern Uganda. Perhaps you are now aware that there is a problem, perhaps you know that there is more to this world than just your country, your state, and your little hometown. What you may not know is that the US government is not going to get involved if it doesn’t benefit the American people. Remember Rwanda? It is up to you to figure out how to deal with this knowledge and the knowledge that your warm and fuzzy thoughts are not going to be the solution to this.
Let’s face it, Tommy Jefferson and Bennie Franklin could never have envisioned things like the following;
Weyerbacher Brewing Co. Blasphemy
no marking things up just to turn around and "lower" the price.
that I can have you
Fast forward to 7th July 2005 and I was in hospital with Jack who was very ill with seizures. I seemed to spend the week crying as my boy was unable to eat properly as he was slowly losing the ability to chew. He had a TV above his bed which was rarely on but then another parent whose child was in the bed opposite had his TV on and I have a vague recollection of the nurses gathering around his TV to watch with horror the story unfolding.
03. Your eyes 5:21
Seriously, these are two of my favorite shows.
Creating that space, or “air”, is perhaps one of the things that can be done in relationships when the desire is at a low ebb. But also just realizing that the ebbs of desire will be accompanied by upward flows is one way to ensure expectations for sex don’t get in the way of pleasure from sex, especially in the context of long-term relationships.
In Psalm 91: God’s Shield of Protection, Military Edition, a story is told about the Miracle of Seadrift, Texas. To summarize, the church had a prayer board for all their deployed soldiers in WWII displaying the soldiers’ pictures and names so that the church congregation could pray for their success in combat and their safe return. Well, all of the soldiers on that board made it home safely. Fast forward to the war in Iraq: Sgt. Leslie King was the grandson of one of those Seadrift soldiers. He called his mother and told her that something didn’t feel right; that he didn’t feel the shield of protection over him and his men anymore. Come to find out, the military pictures had been taken down because the “war” was considered to be over. Over a three-week period that the photos were down, Sgt. King’s unit experienced difficulty in combat and even deaths. The photos were put back up, giving the congregation visual contact as they prayed for each deployed soldier and King wrote back to his mother to tell her that the peace had returned. (Ruth-Schum, p. 142)
4 Tbsp sour cream
Oh celebrity mums. How they like to shove their teeny tiny baby bumps in our faces. How they love to show off the post baby body twenty seconds after giving birth. How they adore writing their parenting manuals, designing the babywear collections and declaring they do it all with no help whatsobloodyever.
My 2 cents:
If only he/she is more faithful.
Feeling REALLY pumped after getting that done, I wanted to shout it out to the world. Can you guess what I did next?? That’s right!! I started a blog! Ha!!
There are many simple answers to these problems that are anything but simple. Blame can be laid everywhere. Every government since the second World War is to blame. The police are to blame. The media are to blame. Social networking is to blame. The parents are to blame.
Having travelled from a liberal western world to diverse places, I can honestly say that, as a woman, I feel lucky and relieved that I was born in the west, in the UK and not in Pakistan or somewhere equally as oppressive for women.
* Take car to garage
What’s your style? West & Run is a pop/rock band.
Notes: This should be a maximal UNBROKEN set. If you completed all 20 reps last week, add approximately 5% this week. If you were close to completing all 20 reps (15-19), use the same weight. If you weren’t close (10-14), take off 5%.
I have a month to figure out how I'm going to handle Christmas (the food of choice for Christmas in my family is a standing rib roast, potatoes cooked in heavy cream and garlic, and asparagus smothered in Bearnaise sauce... we keep paramedics standing by) and I'll spend some of this month researching recipes that I can bring along with me to share. Perhaps a creamy butternut squash soup? We shall see.
5 cloves minced garlic
You can not possibly claim with any credibility that this is a non-heritage part of the city Mister Mayor, and you should not spread those lies any longer. It is really not acceptable that you justify your wrong decision to go ahead with buildings of excessive, and out of scale, height and bulk, by claiming they do not impact on Fremantle’s heritage.
5…maximize web traffic.
One of my youngest, shyest little girls made nothing at all on the first round; she just said that she couldn’t. On the second round, she worked very hard, and made a square! It was not a cube, but a flat, one dimensional square. But considering that on the first try she just basically explored the materials and constructed nothing, I was satisfied with that! Besides, my volunteer told me that she had worked very hard to make that square! So we have to consider that she did show some growth in her attempts to improve.
Such delicate crochet. It looks like she used size 20 or 30 crochet cotton.
And I have found the poem I loved the best.
: a company of equals or friends : association
BF: That’s for the simple reason that the military does not produce tradable goods. They were a parasitic entity on the world economy.
It’s Friday and time for BYOC – Bring Your Own Crazy! A couple of questions we answer to get to know each other better and to give our blogging brains a break. Copy to your own blog and enjoy!
My block is called Kitty Corner. This is made with all 3.5 inch squares. I call it Kitty Corner due to the adorable fabric with little kitties on it. I only had enough for this one block and actually had to supplement with dogs, but they're super cute too. Ok, now it doesn't look like much as a single block does it? But take a look at a quilt made out of these block. Now it makes a little more sense huh? And the border, 3.5 inch squares too. A 16 block quilt with borders is 69x69, a 9 block quilt with borders is 54x54 - still a respectable size. 9 block loses a little of the circular motion there. And if you put full square in the corner you get something that looks like this.
It is here when I do not delve into gossips that the bored mind dwells on in search of connecting and the want to put into words complex feelings that was created in response to another. The analysis of those feelings usually surface towards a black or white direction although the entirety is never as simple as that. It was just the exchange of energies, and it is really unnecessary to qualify and quantify the experience of the person to be something too straightforwardly good or bad. We can discuss. But we do not get locked into the conversation so far as to become stuck in one mood, belittling the emotions that could be shared and the real intelligence of the ideas.
But what exactly is holiness? There are two aspects of holiness. The first is that God is so separate or set apart. The second is God’s moral perfection; His purity. God is set apart from us because He is so perfect. God is so vastly opposite sin that He cannot be in the presence of it. God and sin are mutually exclusive.
Place the nuts in the bowl of a food processor and pulse the nuts just til they have a fine consisitency. Don't overpulse. You don't want to make a paste!
though hearing, they do not hear or understand.”
I'm back from vacation...and apparently just in time! Auditor General Jack Wagner's audit of the wine kiosk fiasco -- sorry, program -- is out today, and it's pretty much unforgiving. Well, the man's an auditor; of course it's not forgiving, that's not his job, and this was a fiasco. Some pertinent stuff (the full report's here in PDF format; the AG's statement is here (added emphases are mine, of course)):
“Then what makes you think she has money to give?”
SUBGENRE.. : n/a
More and more people are becoming interested in growing moss gardens. I've been asked how I grew mine, so I will share.
Trinidad is one of those God forsaken small towns that seem to revolve around gossip, alcohol and high school athletics. I began my life in town as a 7th grader, still seething with disparity and hatred. As the new kid, I had no choice but to be bullied and sought refuge with my kindred, primarily Jimmy, another 7th grader who would become a lifelong friend. By the time we had made it to high school and I had made friends out of my tormentors, I had entered into a phase of delinquency and drug use in which I would swallow any pill on the table and turn coat on practically anyone if there was anything in it for me, especially a female.
Of course, sketches are perfect for cards, too. I’m feeling the love for the baby stuff now, so I continue on and made a baby card. This time I turned the sketch upside down for a little different look.
He is survived by his loving wife Sonia Walton. His son Songhai A. Walton of Fort Myers, Florida, two brothers, James Walton of Columbia, South Carolina, Joseph Walton of New York City, three nieces, one nephew along with a host of very special family and friends.
If anyone ever looks at my ring asks, "What the hell is THAT?" I will simply say, "I bought it in Paris." That will shut them up, and make them feel embarrassed about their lack of fashion sense.
Passed out after church (9mos) Since church is at 1pm-it really gets in the way of nap time. Gary usually puts her to sleep but the noises tend to keep her up or wake her up prematurely. She always conks out on our way home from church.
IV. Use a sheet protector to hold all items relevant to one product: receipt, warranty, and user guide, if any.
While Ryan is waiting at the school,
“I was hoping she could give me some investment advice,” I replied. “I’ve got some spare cash I want to invest in the stock market.”
7 Kristin Tayo W Canyon Country, CA 9:30.6 29:32.64
Pure, unconditional love is what opens doorways and portals within our life. Her shifting her focus from herself to her children revealed the heavenly potential surrounding her (and all of us.) Thru the asking she altered the field to reveal even more. She shifted from herself to the community of her family with such a vibration of love.
Let me be clear. He did not hit me. He did not hit the kids in any way that could not be written off as discipline. I would have known how to handle that.
While at REI I checked to see if they had some running shoes I’ve been lusting after. They did AND they had last year’s model (which got better reviews) on sale for $80! Quite a steal for Brooks as they are notoriously pricey. Keri treated me to the shoes in hopes that I’ll start running with her on a regular basis. I agreed to it and hope that my knee can handle the impact.
But still he was entranced by the gentleness of her body as she stood there, immobile. The delicate curve of her elbow, her arm smooth and dark as polished ebony (she was from down south), her hip jutting out to hold it, her knee slightly bent in just such a way; these features gave her entire stance the coquettish form of a famous statue, one he once knew but could not quite place...
The contract to attack Sarawak Report
I hope you enjoyed meeting our Peace family.
Around the summit at Mile 12, heavy clouds/fog meant I missed out on what is supposed to be a beautiful view back on the climb I just did. Oh well, I was happy to keep moving — and moving down toward the Bixby Bridge, the marathon’s halfway point.
The Palestinians and the Egyptians have made many announcements about "breakthroughs" in negotiations. I remember when people were talking about a release before Yom Kippur, or before the end of Ramadan. Nothing happened.
-1 box white cake mix
I heard Freddie finished his work in Alaska
Last month was my husband's birthday. The best part of the day was tricking him into believing he was a year older than he actually is. Ahhh, the joys of having a wife like me, I can't imagine what it's like for him.
“You’ve hit the right nail on the head,” said Digby. “I disliked the way he spoke of glowing canvases. It reminded me too much of the auctioneer. But I’ll call on the man next time I’m in London.”
And we need to make sure that there are pro-growth, supply side economics to make sure that Puerto Rico can be successful as an economy on that island, and I believe they can. And under my administration, that’s something that I would work towards.
Houses of Parliament
I am grateful she is no longer in pain
“You think I’m crazy?”
and 'me as mother' meeting fear again and again
Sun, Sep 30 Miami, FL AmericanAirlines Arena Fri, May 11
In no way is his behaviour comparable with that of us gorillas, who fart considerately in the open air, and direct our discharges so as to minimise the risk of passive fart inhalation by innocent bystanders (a category which excludes baboons and snakes, who are never innocent). With such issues in mind, I sent the following reply to the presumptuous lawyer:
Our lives are shaken over the years, because this is not Heaven, but I can't allow my faith to be shaken.
A Pepsi marketing exec said...
Bottom line was, it was a great place to be if ganja is your thing, and of course legalised prostitution. Which I won’t bother to go into any detail of.
Some-days I choose to be happy my jaw aches from the clenching and bearing, some days the weight and the fear,the pure exhaustion of the daily mountain of shame, grief and sorrow, kick my tush into the back of my walk-in- closet for a good cry. Then I CHOOSE to walk out of that closet, wipe my nose, and take that mountain step by every loving step.
2. Anything worth loving demands sacrifice. A letter is proof that someone stopped what they were doing and dedicated their thoughts and words to you. They are not transient and effortless like email.
Thank you, headache, for reminding me of this.
A policeman is trying to write something down in his notepad but the young couple want none of it. Tracy has one hand on Tony's cock, whilst Tony has a stray hand on Tracy's arse. As the van pulls away, I throw my head back against the cold metal behind me and smile.
recently
Me: Yes. It. Is.
